Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB612.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 138 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Alcoholic beverage" has the same meaning as in Section 6 of this Act:
(b) "Alcoholic beverage retailer" or "retailer" means a person who sells any
alcoholic beverage to a consumer in Kentucky for any purpose, including:
1. At a Kentucky retail location;
2. At premises as defined in Section 6 of this Act in Kentucky;
3. To a consumer at a Kentucky address by a direct shipper;
4. By any other direct-to-consumer seller; or
5. To a consumer through any other approved location or method
authorized by law;
(c) "Direct shipper" means a direct shipper licensed in KRS 243.027;
(d) "Gross receipts":
1. Means the total amount or consideration, including cash, credit,
property, and services, for which alcoholic beverages are sold, valued
in money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any
deduction for any of the following:
a. The alcoholic beverage retailer's cost of the alcoholic beverages;
b. Charges by the retailer for any services necessary to complete the
sale; and
c. Delivery charges by the retailer for the preparation and delivery
to a location designated by the purchaser, including
transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and
packing; and
Page 1 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
2. Does not include:
a. Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not
reimbursed by a third party and that are allowed by an alcoholic
beverage retailer and taken by a purchaser on a sale;
b. Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended
on the sale of alcoholic beverages, if the amount is separately
stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to
the purchaser;
c. Any state retail regulatory license fees or taxes legally imposed
directly on the purchaser that are separately stated on the
invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser,
including sales tax imposed by KRS 139.200;
d. Local alcohol regulatory license fees authorized in Section 16 of
this Act that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or
similar document given to the purchaser; or
e. Sales made by a direct shipper to a consumer located outside of
Kentucky;
(e) "Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture, committee,
association, corporation, governmental unit, nonprofit organization, or any
other organization or group of persons;
(f) "State retail regulatory license fee" includes interest accrued at the rate
provided by KRS 131.183, all applicable penalties imposed pursuant to this
chapter, and all applicable penalties and fees imposed pursuant to KRS
131.180, 131.410 to 131.445, and 131.990; and
(g) "Third party" means a person other than the purchaser.
(2) On or after July 1, 2027, a state retail regulatory license fee is imposed on all
alcoholic beverage retailers at the rate of four percent (4%) of the gross receipts
Page 2 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
derived from the sale of alcoholic beverages to consumers in this state.
(3) The state retail regulatory license fee shall be:
(a) Administered by the department; and
(b) Transferred to the general fund.
(4) The state retail regulatory license fee:
(a) May be added to the selling price charged by the alcoholic beverage retailer
on the alcoholic beverages, when stated separately; and
(b) Shall be paid by the alcoholic beverage retailer as prescribed in
administrative regulations promulgated by the department in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) The alcoholic beverage retailer is liable for the state retail regulatory license fee.
(6) (a) Every alcoholic beverage retailer shall, by the twentieth day of each month,
transmit to the department reports, on the forms the department may
prescribe, on the total retail sales for the month and state retail regulatory
license fees due.
(b) For purposes of facilitating the administration, payment, or collection of the
state retail regulatory license fees levied by this chapter, the department
may, within its discretion, permit or require returns or fee payments for
periods other than those prescribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(7) Payment of the state retail regulatory license fee shall be due with the report.
(8) (a) For reimbursement of the cost of collecting and remitting the fee, the
alcoholic beverage retailer shall deduct on each return one-quarter of one
percent (0.25%) of the fee due, provided the amount due is not delinquent at
the time of payment.
(b) The total reimbursement allowed for each alcohol beverage retailer shall
not exceed fifty dollars ($50) per return.
(c) For purposes of this subsection only, "alcoholic beverage retailer" shall not
Page 3 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
include a distiller.
(9) The alcoholic beverage retailer shall keep and preserve an accurate record of all
receipts of its alcoholic beverage products sold, and state retail regulatory license
fees due, together with invoices or other pertinent records and papers required by
the department for four (4) years.
(10) An alcoholic beverage retailer or other person shall not:
(a) Fail or refuse to make the returns and pay the state retail regulatory license
fee prescribed by this section;
(b) Refuse to permit the department or any representative appointed by the
commissioner in writing to examine his or her records, papers, files, and
equipment pertaining to the taxable business;
(c) Make an incomplete, false, or fraudulent return, or attempt to do anything
to avoid:
1. A full disclosure of the amount of business done; or
2. The payment of the whole or any part of the state retail regulatory
license fee or penalties due; or
(d) Fail to keep and preserve records of the alcoholic beverage products sold by
the alcoholic beverage retailer to substantiate the reports required by this
section.
(11) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to the
uniform civil penalties imposed pursuant to KRS 131.180 and interest at the tax
interest rate as defined in KRS 131.183.
(12) (a) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or any other person
holding any equivalent corporate office of any corporation subject to
this section shall be personally and individually liable, both jointly and
severally, for the state retail regulatory license fees imposed by this
Page 4 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
section, and neither the corporate dissolution nor withdrawal of the
corporation from the state nor the cessation of holding any corporate
office shall discharge the foregoing liability of any person.
2. The personal and individual liability shall apply to each and every
person holding the corporate office at the time the state retail
regulatory license fees become or became due.
3. A person shall not be personally and individually liable pursuant to
this section who had no authority in the management of the business
or financial affairs of the corporation at the time that the state retail
regulatory license fees imposed by this section become or became due.
(b) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, KRS 275.150,
362.1-306(3) or predecessor law, or 362.2-404(3) to the contrary, the
managers of a limited liability company, the partners of a limited
liability partnership, and the general partners of a limited liability
limited partnership or any other person holding any equivalent office
of a limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability limited partnership subject to this section shall be personally
and individually liable, both jointly and severally, for the state retail
regulatory license fees imposed by this section.
2. Dissolution, withdrawal of the limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or limited liability limited partnership from the
state, or the cessation of holding any office shall not discharge the
liability of any person. The personal and individual liability shall
apply to every manager of a limited liability company, partner of a
limited liability partnership, or general partner of a limited liability
limited partnership at the time the state retail regulatory license fees
become or became due.
Page 5 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(13) The department may prescribe forms and promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to execute and administer this section. The
state retail regulatory license fee may be paid via electronic funds transfer. The
alcoholic beverage retailer shall provide the department with all protocol
documentation and electronic funds transfer data necessary to facilitate the
timely transfer of funds.
SECTION 2. KRS CHAPTER 243A IS ESTABLISHED AND A NEW
SECTION THEREOF IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) On or after July 1, 2027, a state wholesale regulatory license fee is imposed at a
rate of four-tenths of a cent ($0.004) for each milliliter of alcohol contained in an
alcoholic beverage for human consumption sold, used, or distributed by sale or
gift in the Commonwealth of Kentucky on every:
(a) Wholesaler;
(b) Distributor;
(c) Distiller that directly transfers products to its retail premises;
(d) Small farm winery that directly transfers products to its retail premises;
(e) Manufacturer permitted to self-distribute to retailers; and
(f) Direct shipper.
(2) (a) On or after July 1, 2027, a state wholesale regulatory license fee is imposed
on a microbrewery for its barrels directly transferred to a retailer or
consumer independent of a distributor at the following rates for each
milliliter of alcohol contained in an alcoholic beverage for human
consumption sold, used, or distributed by sale or gift in the Commonwealth
of Kentucky:
1. For the first fifteen thousand (15,000) taxable, directly transferred
barrels in a calendar year, at a rate of fourteen one-hundredths of a
cent ($0.0014) for each milliliter of alcohol contained in an alcoholic
Page 6 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
beverage sold; and
2. For any directly transferred barrels exceeding the first fifteen
thousand (15,000) taxable, directly transferred barrels in a calendar
year, at a rate of four-tenths of a cent ($0.004) for each milliliter of
alcohol contained in an alcoholic beverage sold for human
consumption in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(b) A microbrewery that directly transfers products to a retailer or consumer
independent of a distributor prior to July 1, 2027, and:
1. Directly transfers more than one thousand (1,000) barrels in calendar
year 2026 is subject to the state wholesale regulatory license fee in
paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
2. a. Directly transfers less than one thousand (1,000) barrels in
calendar year 2026 is exempt from the state wholesale regulatory
license fee in paragraph (a) of this subsection, subject to
subdivision b. of this subparagraph.
b. If the microbrewery directly transfers more than one thousand
(1,000) barrels in a calendar year after 2026, the state wholesale
regulatory license fee imposed by paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall apply to:
i. All directly transferred gallons exceeding the first one
thousand (1,000) barrels in that calendar year; and
ii. All directly transferred gallons in subsequent calendar
years.
(c) 1. A microbrewery that begins directly transferring products to a retailer
or consumer independent of a distributor on or after July 1, 2027, is
exempt from the state wholesale regulatory license fee levied in
paragraph (a) of this subsection on the first one thousand (1,000)
Page 7 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
barrels sold in a calendar year, subject to subparagraph 2. of this
paragraph.
2. If the microbrewery directly transfers more than one thousand (1,000)
barrels in a calendar year, the state wholesale regulatory license fee
imposed by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall apply to:
a. All directly transferred barrels exceeding the first one thousand
(1,000) barrels in that calendar year; and
b. All directly transferred barrels in subsequent calendar years.
(3) For timely filing and payment, the wholesaler, distributor, distiller, small farm
winery, manufacturer, direct shipper, or microbrewery shall deduct, for each
milliliter transferred or sold, seven-thousandths of a cent ($0.00007) per milliliter
of alcohol contained in an alcoholic beverage sold for human consumption in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, provided the amount due is not delinquent at the
time of payment.
(4) (a) A wholesaler, distributor, distiller, small farm winery, manufacturer, direct
shipper, and microbrewery shall pay and report the state wholesale
regulatory license fee levied in subsections (1) and (2) of this section to the
Department of Revenue on or before the twentieth day of the calendar
month next succeeding the month in which possession or title of the
alcoholic beverages is transferred from the wholesaler, distributor, distiller,
small farm winery, manufacturer, direct shipper, or microbrewery to
manufacturers, retailers, or consumers in this state, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A
designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(b) The report of the state wholesale regulatory license fees shall be on the
forms the Department of Revenue prescribes and shall include:
1. Total milliliters of alcohol transferred or sold, with a listing
Page 8 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
containing the container size of each type of product transferred or
sold, the milliliters per container, and how many products were sold;
and
2. The amount of state wholesale regulatory license fees due.
(5) (a) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or any other person
holding any equivalent corporate office of any corporation subject to
this section shall be personally and individually liable, both jointly and
severally, for the state wholesale regulatory license fees imposed by
this section, and neither the corporate dissolution nor withdrawal of
the corporation from the state nor the cessation of holding any
corporate office shall discharge the foregoing liability of any person.
2. The personal and individual liability shall apply to each and every
person holding the corporate office at the time the state wholesale
regulatory license fees become or became due.
3. A person shall not be personally and individually liable pursuant to
this section who had no authority in the management of the business
or financial affairs of the corporation at the time that the state
wholesale regulatory license fees imposed by this section become or
became due.
(b) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, KRS 275.150,
362.1-306(3) or predecessor law, or 362.2-404(3) to the contrary, the
managers of a limited liability company, the partners of a limited
liability partnership, and the general partners of a limited liability
limited partnership or any other person holding any equivalent office
of a limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability limited partnership subject to this section shall be personally
Page 9 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
and individually liable, both jointly and severally, for the state
wholesale regulatory license fees imposed by this section.
2. Dissolution, withdrawal of the limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or limited liability limited partnership from the
state, or the cessation of holding any office shall not discharge the
liability of any person. The personal and individual liability shall
apply to every manager of a limited liability company, partner of a
limited liability partnership, or general partner of a limited liability
limited partnership at the time the state wholesale regulatory license
fees become or became due.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 243A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Food" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.2201;
(b) "Hemp" means the plant species Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that
plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts,
cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or
not, with a total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more
than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis;
(c) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product":
1. Means any intermediate or final product derived from hemp that:
a. Contains cannabinoids in any form; and
b. Is intended for human or animal use through any means of
application or administration, such as inhalation, ingestion, or
topical application; and
2. Includes but is not limited to cannabis-infused beverages, as defined
in Section 6 of this Act, and any other edible or consumable product
Page 10 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
containing tetrahydrocannabinol, regardless of the extraction method
used to obtain the tetrahydrocannabinol;
(d) "Kratom" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.2201;
(e) "Kratom extract" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.2201;
(f) "Kratom product" has the same meaning as in KRS 217.2201;
(g) "Person" has the same meaning as in Section 36 of this Act;
(h) "Retailer" means any person that sells or ships hemp-derived cannabinoid
products, kratom extracts, or kratom products for any purpose other than
resale:
1. At a Kentucky retail location; or
2. To a Kentucky address; and
(i) "State retail regulatory license fee" includes interest accrued at the rate
provided by KRS 131.183, all applicable penalties imposed pursuant to this
chapter, and all applicable penalties and fees imposed pursuant to KRS
131.180, 131.410 to 131.445, and 131.990.
(2) On or after July 1, 2027, a state retail regulatory license fee is levied on retailers
for the privilege of selling kratom extracts or kratom products in this state at the
rate of:
(a) Four cents ($0.04) per milligram of mitragynine in kratom product sold if
the concentration of kratom is two percent (2%) or less per serving;
(b) Four dollars ($4) per milligram of mitragynine in kratom product sold if the
concentration of kratom is more than two percent (2%) per serving;
(c) Forty cents ($0.40) per milligram of mitragynine in kratom extract sold if
the concentration of kratom is two percent (2%) or less; and
(d) Eight dollars ($8) per milligram of mitragynine in kratom extract sold if the
concentration of kratom is more than two percent (2%) per serving.
(3) On or after July 1, 2027, a state retail regulatory license fee is levied on retailers
Page 11 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
for the privilege of selling hemp-derived cannabinoid products in this state at the
rate of sixteen cents ($0.16) per milligram or milliliter, as labeled on the product,
of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol or any other
form of tetrahydrocannabinol sold.
(4) The state retail regulatory license fees shall be:
(a) Administered by the Department of Revenue;
(b) Transferred to the general fund; and
(c) Paid by the retailer as prescribed in administrative regulations promulgated
by the Department of Revenue in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(5) The retailer is liable for the state retail regulatory license fee.
(6) Every retailer shall, by the twentieth day of each month, transmit reports to the
Department of Revenue, on the forms the Department of Revenue may prescribe,
on the:
(a) Total kratom products sold, with a listing containing the description of each
type of product sold, which contains the milligrams of mitragynine per
serving and how many servings are in each product;
(b) Total mitragynine milligrams contained in the kratom products sold;
(c) Total hemp-derived cannabinoid products sold, with a listing containing the
description of each type of product sold which contains the milligrams of
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol or any other
form of tetrahydrocannabinol per serving and how many servings are in
each product;
(d) Total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol or delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol or any
other form of tetrahydrocannabinol milligrams contained in the products
sold; and
(e) Amount of state retail regulatory license fees due.
(7) Payment of the state retail regulatory license fee shall be due with the report.
Page 12 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(8) The retailer shall keep and preserve an accurate record of all receipts of its hemp-
derived cannabinoid products, kratom extracts, and kratom products sold, and
state retail regulatory license fees due, together with invoices or other pertinent
records and papers required by the Department of Revenue for four (4) years.
(9) A retailer or other person shall not:
(a) Fail or refuse to make the returns and pay the state retail regulatory license
fee prescribed by this section;
(b) Refuse to permit the Department of Revenue or any representative
appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Revenue in writing to
examine his or her records, papers, files, and equipment pertaining to the
taxable business;
(c) Make an incomplete, false, or fraudulent return, or attempt to do anything
to avoid:
1. A full disclosure of the amount of business done; or
2. The payment of the whole or any part of the state retail regulatory
license fee or penalties due; or
(d) Fail to keep and preserve records of the hemp-derived cannabinoid products
sold, kratom extracts, or kratom products sold by the retailer to substantiate
the reports required by this section.
(10) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to the
uniform civil penalties imposed pursuant to KRS 131.180 and interest at the tax
interest rate as defined in KRS 131.183.
(11) (a) 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary,
the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or any other person
holding any equivalent corporate office of any corporation subject to
this section shall be personally and individually liable, both jointly and
severally, for the state retail regulatory license fees imposed by this
Page 13 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
section, and neither the corporate dissolution nor withdrawal of the
corporation from the state nor the cessation of holding any corporate
office shall discharge the foregoing liability of any person.
2. The personal and individual liability shall apply to each and every
person holding the corporate office at the time the state retail
regulatory license fees become or became due.
3. A person shall not be personally and individually liable pursuant to
this section who had no authority in the management of the business
or financial affairs of the corporation at the time that the state retail
regulatory license fees imposed by this section become or became due.
(b) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, KRS 275.150,
362.1-306(3) or predecessor law, or 362.2-404(3) to the contrary, the
managers of a limited liability company, the partners of a limited
liability partnership, and the general partners of a limited liability
limited partnership or any other person holding any equivalent office
of a limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited
liability limited partnership subject to this section shall be personally
and individually liable, both jointly and severally, for the state retail
regulatory license fees imposed by this section.
2. Dissolution, withdrawal of the limited liability company, limited
liability partnership, or limited liability limited partnership from the
state, or the cessation of holding any office shall not discharge the
liability of any person. The personal and individual liability shall
apply to every manager of a limited liability company, partner of a
limited liability partnership, or general partner of a limited liability
limited partnership at the time the state retail regulatory license fees
becomes or became due.
Page 14 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(12) The Department of Revenue may prescribe forms and promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to execute and administer this
section. The state retail regulatory license fee may be paid via electronic funds
transfer. The retailer shall provide the department with all protocol
documentation and electronic funds transfer data necessary to facilitate the
timely transfer of funds.
(13) It is the purpose and intent of the General Assembly to impose regulatory license
fees on retailers of substances that may have an intoxicating effect on users. It is
not the intent of the General Assembly to legalize such activities if not otherwise
legal.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 243A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person who violates any provision of Section 2 or 3 of this Act or any
administrative regulation promulgated thereunder shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
(2) Any person who violates any provision of Section 2 or 3 of this Act shall be
subject to the uniform civil penalties imposed pursuant to KRS 131.180.
(3) Any state wholesale regulatory license fee imposed by Section 2 of this Act and
any state retail regulatory license fee imposed by Section 3 of this Act that is not
paid on or before the due date shall bear interest at the tax interest rate as defined
in KRS 131.010 from the due date until the date of payment.
Section 5. KRS 211.285 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created the alcohol wellness and responsibility education fund,
which shall provide moneys on a matching basis for educational information and
materials that deter or eliminate underage drinking. The fund shall consist of
moneys generated from:
(a) One percent (1%) of the excise tax collected from the sale and distribution of
Page 15 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
malt beverages under KRS 243.720 before July 1, 2027;[,]
(b) One percent (1%) of the wholesale tax collected from distributors of malt
beverages and microbreweries under KRS 243.884 before July 1, 2027;[,
and]
(c) One-half of one percent (0.5%) of the state retail regulatory license fee
collected from the sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to Section 1 of this
Act on or after July 1, 2027; and
(d) All proceeds from public auctions conducted by the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Board under KRS 241.060 and 243.540.
(2) The alcohol wellness and responsibility education fund shall be established in the
State Treasury as a trust and agency account under KRS 45.253. Moneys in the
account shall be distributed by the State Treasurer to the Alcohol Wellness and
Responsibility Education Corporation, a nonprofit organization that is organized
under the laws of this state, upon the authorization of the secretary of the Public
Protection Cabinet. The moneys shall be awarded to the corporation solely to fund
educational programs to deter or eliminate underage drinking and promote alcohol
responsibility measures.
(3) The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet shall authorize that moneys from the
fund be disbursed to the corporation upon the secretary's receipt of a certification
from the corporation showing the moneys the corporation has received from malt
beverage distributors, microbreweries, auctions, and other private sources since the
last certification. The moneys disbursed from the fund shall be equal to the
contributions that the corporation has received from its members and other private
sources during that period. The moneys in the fund shall be disbursed in accordance
with a schedule established by the secretary, and shall be disbursed until the
moneys in the fund are exhausted or until the moneys in the fund lapse in
accordance with subsection (4) of this section, whichever comes first.
Page 16 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(4) Moneys that are credited to the fund and not issued to the corporation shall lapse at
the end of the fiscal year and shall be returned to the general fund.
(5) As a condition of receiving the governmental funds, the corporation's board of
directors shall include the following among its directors:
(a) All duly elected statewide constitutional officers or designees;
(b) The President of the Senate or designee, who shall serve as a nonvoting
member;
(c) The Speaker of the House or designee, who shall serve as a nonvoting
member;
(d) The secretary of the Public Protection Cabinet or designee;
(e) The commissioner of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control or
designee;
(f) A representative of the malt beverage industry submitted by the Kentucky
Beer Wholesalers' Association;
(g) A representative of the malt beverage industry submitted by the Kentucky
Malt Beverage Council;
(h) A representative of the Kentucky Guild of Brewers submitted by the
Kentucky Guild of Brewers; and
(i)[(h)] A representative of the distilled spirits industry submitted by the
Kentucky Distillers' Association.
(6) All expenditures of moneys from the fund shall be approved by a majority of those
persons set out in subsection (5)(a) and (d) to (h) of this section. If the moneys from
the fund are not expended in their entirety, any moneys that remain unused by the
corporation at the end of the fiscal year shall be returned to the general fund.
(7) Any moneys from the fund that are not expended shall be returned to the general
fund upon the dissolution of the corporation.
(8) The Alcohol Wellness and Responsibility Education Corporation may accept
Page 17 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
applications for grants by Kentucky high schools, colleges and universities, and
other entities that promote alcohol responsibility, and the board of directors shall
develop criteria for the awarding of any funds by application.
(9) Any high school in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that was registered with the
Department of Education as of July 1, 2024, may make an application to the
Alcohol Wellness and Responsibility Education Corporation by February 28 of
each year and shall be granted a minimum of one thousand dollars ($1,000)
annually from the funds contributed by the alcohol wellness and responsibility
education fund for the single purpose of supporting "Project Graduation" events.
Section 6. KRS 241.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS Chapters 241 to 244, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Alcohol" means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl or spirit of wine, from
whatever source or by whatever process it is produced;
(2) "Alcoholic beverage" means every liquid, solid, powder, or crystal, whether
patented or not, containing alcohol in an amount in excess of more than one percent
(1%) of alcohol by volume, which is fit for beverage purposes. It includes distilled
spirits, wine, malt beverages, and every spurious or imitation liquor sold as, or
under any name commonly used for, alcoholic beverages containing alcohol in an
amount in excess of more than one percent (1%) of alcohol by volume[, whether
containing any alcohol or not]. It does not include the following products:
(a) Medicinal preparations manufactured in accordance with formulas prescribed
by the United States Pharmacopoeia, National Formulary, or the American
Institute of Homeopathy;
(b) Patented, patent, and proprietary medicines;
(c) Toilet, medicinal, and antiseptic preparations and solutions;
(d) Flavoring extracts and syrups;
(e) Denatured alcohol or denatured rum;
Page 18 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(f) Vinegar and preserved sweet cider;
(g) Wine for sacramental purposes;[ and]
(h) Alcohol unfit for beverage purposes that is to be sold for legitimate external
use; and
(i) Products intended for human consumption containing cannabinoids that
have intoxicating properties that change the function of the nervous system
and result in alterations of perception, cognition, or behavior;
(3) (a) "Alcohol vaporizing device" or "AWOL device" means any device, machine,
or process that mixes liquor, spirits, or any other alcohol product with pure
oxygen or by any other means produces a vaporized alcoholic product used
for human consumption;
(b) "Alcohol vaporizing device" or "AWOL device" does not include an inhaler,
nebulizer, atomizer, or other device that is designed and intended by the
manufacturer to dispense a prescribed or over-the-counter medication or a
device installed and used by a licensee under this chapter to demonstrate the
aroma of an alcoholic beverage;
(4) "Automobile race track" means a facility primarily used for vehicle racing that has a
seating capacity of at least thirty thousand (30,000) people;
(5) "Barrel-aged and batched cocktail" means an alcoholic beverage that is:
(a) Composed of:
1. Distilled spirits that have been dispensed from their original sealed
container; and
2. Other ingredients or alcoholic beverages;
(b) Placed into a barrel or container on the premises of a retail licensee; and
(c) Dispensed from the barrel or container as a retail sale by the drink;
(6) "Bed and breakfast" means a one (1) family dwelling unit that:
(a) Has guest rooms or suites used, rented, or hired out for occupancy or that are
Page 19 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
occupied for sleeping purposes by persons not members of the single-family
unit;
(b) Holds a permit under KRS Chapter 219; and
(c) Has an innkeeper who resides on the premises or property adjacent to the
premises during periods of occupancy;
(7) "Board" means the State Alcoholic Beverage Control Board created by KRS
241.030;
(8) "Bottle" means any container which is used for holding alcoholic beverages for the
use and sale of alcoholic beverages at retail;
(9) "Brewer" means any person who manufactures malt beverages or owns, occupies,
carries on, works, or conducts any brewery, either alone or through an agent;
(10) "Brewery" means any place or premises where malt beverages are manufactured for
sale, and includes all offices, granaries, mash rooms, cooling rooms, vaults, yards,
and storerooms connected with the premises; or where any part of the process of the
manufacture of malt beverages is carried on; or where any apparatus connected with
manufacture is kept or used; or where any of the products of brewing or
fermentation are stored or kept;
(11) "Building containing licensed premises" means the licensed premises themselves
and includes the land, tract of land, or parking lot in which the premises are
contained, and any part of any building connected by direct access or by an
entrance which is under the ownership or control of the licensee by lease holdings
or ownership;
(12) "Cannabinoid" means a compound found in the hemp plant Cannabis sativa L. from
a United States Department of Agriculture-sanctioned domestic hemp production
program and does not include cannabinoids derived from any other substance;
(13) "Cannabis-infused beverage":
(a) Means a properly permitted adult-use cannabinoid liquid product intended for
Page 20 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
human consumption that has intoxicating properties that change the function
of the nervous system and results in alterations of perception, cognition, or
behavior and shall not contain more than five (5) milligrams of intoxicating
adult-use cannabinoids per twelve (12) ounce serving; and
(b) Shall not include:
1. Medicinal cannabis regulated under KRS Chapter 218B;
2. Any type of hemp tincture; and
3. Any product containing solely nonintoxicating cannabinoids;
(14) "Caterer" means a person operating a food service business that prepares food in a
licensed and inspected commissary, transports the food and alcoholic beverages to
the caterer's designated and inspected banquet hall or to an agreed location, and
serves the food and alcoholic beverages pursuant to an agreement with another
person;
(15) "Charitable organization" means a nonprofit entity recognized as exempt from
federal taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. sec.
501(c), or any organization having been established and continuously operating
within the Commonwealth of Kentucky for charitable purposes for three (3) years
and which expends at least sixty percent (60%) of its gross revenue exclusively for
religious, educational, literary, civic, fraternal, or patriotic purposes;
(16) "Cider" means any fermented fruit-based beverage containing seven percent (7%)
or more alcohol by volume and includes hard cider and perry cider;
(17) "City administrator" means city alcoholic beverage control administrator;
(18) "Commercial airport" means an airport through which more than five hundred
thousand (500,000) passengers arrive or depart annually;
(19) (a) "Commercial quadricycle" means a vehicle equipped with a minimum of ten
(10) pairs of fully operative pedals for propulsion by means of human
muscular power and which:
Page 21 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
1. Has four (4) wheels;
2. Is operated in a manner similar to that of a bicycle;
3. Is equipped with a minimum of thirteen (13) seats for passengers;
4. Has a unibody design;
5. Is equipped with a minimum of four (4) hydraulically operated brakes;
6. Is used for commercial tour purposes;
7. Is operated by the vehicle owner or an employee of the owner; and
8. Has an electrical assist system that shall only be used when traveling to
or from its storage location while not carrying passengers.
(b) A "commercial quadricycle" is not a motor vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010
or 189.010;
(20) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage
Control;
(21) "Consumer" means a person, persons, or business organization who purchases
alcoholic beverages and who:
(a) Does not hold a license or permit issued by the department;
(b) Purchases the alcoholic beverages for personal consumption only and not for
resale;
(c) Is of lawful drinking age; and
(d) Receives the alcoholic beverages in territory where the alcoholic beverages
may be lawfully sold or received;
(22) "Convention center" means any facility which, in its usual and customary business,
provides seating for a minimum of one thousand (1,000) people and offers
convention facilities and related services for seminars, training and educational
purposes, trade association meetings, conventions, or civic and community events
or for plays, theatrical productions, or cultural exhibitions;
(23) "Convicted" and "conviction" means a finding of guilt resulting from a plea of
Page 22 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
guilty, the decision of a court, or the finding of a jury, irrespective of a
pronouncement of judgment or the suspension of the judgment;
(24) "County administrator" means county alcoholic beverage control administrator;
(25) "Department" means the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control;
(26) "Dining car" means a railroad passenger car that serves meals to consumers on any
railroad or Pullman car company;
(27) "Discount in the usual course of business" means price reductions, rebates, refunds,
and discounts given by wholesalers to distilled spirits and wine retailers pursuant to
an agreement made at the time of the sale of the merchandise involved and are
considered a part of the sales transaction, constituting reductions in price pursuant
to the terms of the sale, irrespective of whether the quantity discount was:
(a) Prorated and allowed on each delivery;
(b) Given in a lump sum after the entire quantity of merchandise purchased had
been delivered; or
(c) Based on dollar volume or on the quantity of merchandise purchased;
(28) "Distilled spirits" or "spirits" means any product capable of being consumed by a
human being which contains alcohol obtained by distilling, mixed with water or
other substances in solution, except wine, hard cider, and malt beverages;
(29) "Distiller" means any person who is engaged in the business of manufacturing
distilled spirits at any distillery in the state and is registered in the Office of the
Collector of Internal Revenue for the United States at Louisville, Kentucky;
(30) "Distillery" means any place or premises where distilled spirits are manufactured
for sale, and which are registered in the office of any collector of internal revenue
for the United States. It includes any United States government bonded warehouse;
(31) "Distributor" means any person who distributes malt beverages for the purpose of
being sold at retail;
(32) "Dry" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to prohibit all
Page 23 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
forms of retail alcoholic beverage sales through a local option election held under
KRS Chapter 242;
(33) "Election" means:
(a) An election held for the purpose of taking the sense of the people as to the
application or discontinuance of alcoholic beverage sales under KRS Chapter
242; or
(b) Any other election not pertaining to alcoholic beverages;
(34) "Horse racetrack" means a facility licensed to conduct a horse race meeting under
KRS Chapter 230;
(35) "Hotel" means a hotel, motel, or inn for accommodation of the traveling public,
designed primarily to serve transient patrons;
(36) "Investigator" means any employee or agent of the department who is regularly
employed and whose primary function is to travel from place to place for the
purpose of visiting licensees, and any employee or agent of the department who is
assigned, temporarily or permanently, by the commissioner to duty outside the main
office of the department at Frankfort, in connection with the administration of
alcoholic beverage statutes;
(37) "License" means any license issued pursuant to KRS Chapters 241 to 244;
(38) "Licensee" means any person to whom a license has been issued, pursuant to KRS
Chapters 241 to 244;
(39) "Limited restaurant" means:
(a) A facility where the usual and customary business is the preparation and
serving of meals to consumers, which has a bona fide kitchen facility, which
receives at least seventy percent (70%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food, which maintains a minimum seating capacity of
fifty (50) persons for dining, which has no open bar, which requires that
alcoholic beverages be sold in conjunction with the sale of a meal, and which
Page 24 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
is located in a wet or moist territory under KRS 242.1244; or
(b) A facility where the usual and customary business is the preparation and
serving of meals to consumers, which has a bona fide kitchen facility, which
receives at least seventy percent (70%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food, which maintains a minimum seating capacity of
one hundred (100) persons of dining, and which is located in a wet or moist
territory under KRS 242.1244;
(40) "Local administrator" means a city alcoholic beverage control administrator, county
alcoholic beverage control administrator, or urban-county alcoholic beverage
control administrator;
(41) "Malt beverage" means any fermented undistilled alcoholic beverage of any name
or description, manufactured from malt wholly or in part, or from any substitute for
malt, and includes weak cider;
(42) "Manufacture" means distill, rectify, brew, bottle, and operate a winery;
(43) "Manufacturer" means a winery, distiller, rectifier, or brewer, and any other person
engaged in the production or bottling of alcoholic beverages;
(44) "Marina" means a dock or basin providing moorings for boats and offering supply,
repair, or other services for remuneration;
(45) "Minor" means any person who is not twenty-one (21) years of age or older;
(46) "Moist" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to permit
limited alcoholic beverage sales by any one (1) or a combination of special limited
local option elections authorized by KRS Chapter 242;
(47) "Population" means the population figures established by the federal decennial
census for a census year or the current yearly population estimates prepared by the
Kentucky State Data Center, Urban Studies Center of the University of Louisville,
Louisville, Kentucky, for all other years;
(48) "Premises" means the land and building in and upon which any business regulated
Page 25 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
by alcoholic beverage statutes is operated or carried on. "Premises" shall not
include as a single unit two (2) or more separate businesses of one (1) owner on the
same lot or tract of land, in the same or in different buildings if physical and
permanent separation of the premises is maintained, excluding employee access by
keyed entry and emergency exits equipped with crash bars, and each has a separate
public entrance accessible directly from the sidewalk or parking lot. Any licensee
holding an alcoholic beverage license on July 15, 1998, shall not, by reason of this
subsection, be ineligible to continue to hold his or her license or obtain a renewal,
of the license;
(49) "Primary source of supply" or "supplier" means the distiller, winery, brewer,
producer, owner of the commodity at the time it becomes a marketable product,
bottler, or authorized agent of the brand owner. In the case of imported products,
the primary source of supply means either the foreign producer, owner, bottler, or
agent of the prime importer from, or the exclusive agent in, the United States of the
foreign distiller, producer, bottler, or owner;
(50) "Private club" means a nonprofit social, fraternal, military, or political organization,
club, or nonprofit or for-profit entity maintaining or operating a club room, club
rooms, or premises from which the general public is excluded;
(51) "Private selection event" means a private event with a licensed distiller during
which participating consumers, retail licensees, wholesalers, distributors, or a
distillery's own representatives select a single barrel or a blend of barrels of the
distiller's products to be specially packaged for the participants;
(52) "Private selection package" means a bottle of distilled spirits sourced from the
barrel or barrels selected by participating consumers, retail licensees, wholesalers,
distributors, microbreweries that hold a quota retail drink or quota retail package
license, or a distillery's own representatives during a private selection event;
(53) "Public nuisance" means a condition that endangers safety or health, is offensive to
Page 26 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
the senses, or obstructs the free use of property so as to interfere with the
comfortable enjoyment of life or property by a community or neighborhood or by
any considerable number of persons;
(54) "Qualified historic site" means:
(a) A contributing property with dining facilities for at least fifty (50) persons at
tables, booths, or bars where food may be served within a commercial district
listed in the National Register of Historic Places;
(b) A site that is listed as a National Historic Landmark or in the National
Register of Historic Places with dining facilities for at least fifty (50) persons
at tables, booths, or bars where food may be served;
(c) A distillery which is listed as a National Historic Landmark and which
conducts souvenir retail package sales under KRS 243.0305; or
(d) A not-for-profit or nonprofit facility listed on the National Register of Historic
Places;
(55) "Rectifier" means any person who rectifies, purifies, or refines distilled spirits,
malt, or wine by any process other than as provided for on distillery premises, and
every person who, without rectifying, purifying, or refining distilled spirits by
mixing alcoholic beverages with any materials, manufactures any imitations of or
compounds liquors for sale under the name of whiskey, brandy, gin, rum, wine,
spirits, cordials, bitters, or any other name;
(56) "Repackaging" means the placing of alcoholic beverages in any retail container
irrespective of the material from which the container is made;
(57) "Restaurant" means a facility where the usual and customary business is the
preparation and serving of meals to consumers, that has a bona fide kitchen facility,
and that receives at least fifty percent (50%) of its food and alcoholic beverage
receipts from the sale of food at the premises;
(58) "Retail container" means any bottle, can, barrel, or other container which, without a
Page 27 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
separable intermediate container, holds alcoholic beverages and is suitable and
destined for sale to a retail outlet, whether it is suitable for delivery or shipment to
the consumer or not;
(59) "Retail sale" means any sale of alcoholic beverages to a consumer, including those
transactions taking place in person, electronically, online, by mail, or by telephone;
(60) "Retailer" means any licensee who sells and delivers any alcoholic beverage to
consumers, except for manufacturers with limited retail sale privileges and direct
shipper licensees;
(61) "Riverboat" means any boat or vessel with a regular place of mooring in this state
that is licensed by the United States Coast Guard to carry forty (40) or more
passengers for hire on navigable waters in or adjacent to this state;
(62) "Sale" means any transfer, exchange, or barter for consideration, and includes all
sales made by any person, whether principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or
employee, of any alcoholic beverage;
(63) "Service bar" means a bar, counter, shelving, or similar structure used for storing or
stocking supplies of alcoholic beverages that is a workstation where employees
prepare alcoholic beverage drinks to be delivered to customers away from the
service bar;
(64) "Sell" includes solicit or receive an order for, keep or expose for sale, keep with
intent to sell, and the delivery of any alcoholic beverage;
(65) "Small farm winery" means a winery whose wine production is not less than two
hundred fifty (250) gallons and not greater than five hundred thousand (500,000)
gallons in a calendar year;
(66) "Souvenir package" means a special package of distilled spirits available from a
licensed retailer that is:
(a) Available for retail sale at a licensed Kentucky distillery where the distilled
spirits were produced or bottled; or
Page 28 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(b) Available for retail sale at a licensed Kentucky distillery but produced or
bottled at another of that distiller's licensed distilleries in Kentucky;
(67) "State administrator" or "administrator" means the distilled spirits administrator or
the malt beverages administrator, or both, as the context requires;
(68) (a) "State or national conference" means a formal gathering for people from
across the country or across Kentucky intended for consultation,
deliberation, discussion, or interchange of opinions focusing on issues
relevant to the economy, culture, professional fields, or governance, which
takes place in the Commonwealth of Kentucky and is attended by no less
than three hundred (300) attendees.
(b) "State or national conference" does not include a political campaign
fundraiser;
(69)[(68)] "State park" means a state park that has a:
(a) Nine (9) or eighteen (18) hole golf course; or
(b) Full-service lodge and dining room;
(70)[(69)] "Supplemental bar" means a bar, counter, shelving, or similar structure used
for serving and selling distilled spirits or wine by the drink for consumption on the
licensed premises to guests and patrons from additional locations other than the
main bar;
(71)[(70)] "Territory" means a county, city, district, or precinct;
(72)[(71)] "Urban-county administrator" means an urban-county alcoholic beverage
control administrator;
(73)[(72)] "Valid identification document" means an unexpired, government-issued form
of identification that contains the photograph and date of birth of the individual to
whom it is issued;
(74)[(73)] "Vehicle" means any device or animal used to carry, convey, transport, or
otherwise move alcoholic beverages or any products, equipment, or appurtenances
Page 29 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
used to manufacture, bottle, or sell these beverages;
(75)[(74)] "Vintage distilled spirit" means:
(a) A private selection package; or
(b) A package or packages of distilled spirits that:
1. Are in their original manufacturer's unopened container;
2. Are not owned by a distillery; and
3. Are not otherwise available for purchase from a licensed wholesaler
within the Commonwealth;
(76)[(75)] (a) "Vintage distilled spirits seller" means a nonlicensed person at least
twenty-one (21) years of age who is:
1. An administrator, executor, receiver, or other fiduciary who receives and
sells vintage distilled spirits in execution of the person's fiduciary
capacity;
2. A creditor who receives or takes possession of vintage distilled spirits as
security for, or in payment of, debt, in whole or in part;
3. A public officer or court official who levies on vintage distilled spirits
under order or process of any court or magistrate to sell the vintage
distilled spirits in satisfaction of the order or process; or
4. Any other person not engaged in the business of selling alcoholic
beverages.
(b) "Vintage distilled spirits seller" does not mean:
1. A person selling alcoholic beverages as part of an approved KRS
243.630 transfer; or
2. A person selling alcoholic beverages as authorized by KRS 243.540;
(77)[(76)] "Warehouse" means any place in which alcoholic beverages are housed or
stored;
(78)[(77)] "Weak cider" means any fermented fruit-based beverage containing more than
Page 30 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
one percent (1%) but less than seven percent (7%) alcohol by volume;
(79)[(78)] "Wet" means a territory in which a majority of the electorate voted to permit
all forms of retail alcoholic beverage sales by a local option election under KRS
242.050 or 242.125 on the following question: "Are you in favor of the sale of
alcoholic beverages in (name of territory)?";
(80)[(79)] "Wholesale sale" means a sale to any person for the purpose of resale;
(81)[(80)] "Wholesaler" means any person who distributes alcoholic beverages for the
purpose of being sold at retail, but it shall not include a subsidiary of a
manufacturer or cooperative of a retail outlet;
(82) (a)[(81)] "Wine" means the product of the normal alcoholic fermentation of the
juices of fruits, with the usual processes of manufacture and normal additions,
and includes champagne and sparkling and fortified wine of an alcoholic
content not to exceed twenty-four percent (24%) by volume.
(b) "Wine"[It] includes:
1. Sake, cider, hard cider, and perry cider; and[ also includes]
2. Preparations or mixtures vended in retail containers if these preparations
or mixtures contain not more than fifteen percent (15%) of alcohol by
volume.[ It]
(c) "Wine" does not include weak cider; and
(83)[(82)] "Winery" means any place or premises in which wine is manufactured from
any fruit, or brandies are distilled as a by-product of wine or other fruit, or cordials
are compounded, except a place or premises that manufactures wine for sacramental
purposes exclusively.
Section 7. KRS 241.069 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any city, including any city located in a wet or dry county, county, or urban-county
government may petition the board:
(a) For an increase in the number of quota retail package licenses available in its
Page 31 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
jurisdiction; or
(b) For an increase in the number of quota retail package licenses available in the
county, if the number of quota retail package licenses is governed by KRS
241.066.
A request for an increase shall not exceed the ratio of one (1) per every one
thousand five hundred (1,500) residents.
(2) The board shall consider the following factors when deciding whether to grant the
increase:
(a) Population served by the city, county, or urban-county government;
(b) Estimated total retail sales of the city, county, or urban-county government for
the most recent past fiscal year;
(c) Estimated retail sales per capita for the most recent past fiscal year;
(d) Estimated total alcohol sales in the city, county, or urban-county government
for the most recent past fiscal year;
(e) Tourist destinations in the area, if applicable; and
(f) Other economic and commercial data offered to show the capacity to support
additional licenses.
(3) The board shall grant the request if the information supplied supports the requested
increase[, and shall begin the process of filing an amendment to its administrative
regulation to register the increase. Additional licenses shall not be issued until the
administrative regulation process is complete and the amendment is adopted].
(4) If the board determines the information supplied does not support a quota increase,
it shall notify the city, county, or urban-county government of its decision by
registered mail at the address given in the request. The city, county, or urban-county
government shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the mailing to file a written
request for a hearing before the board regarding its request for an increase.
Section 8. KRS 243.020 is amended to read as follows:
Page 32 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(1) A person shall not do any act authorized by any kind of license with respect to the
manufacture, storage, sale, purchase, transporting, or other traffic in alcoholic
beverages or the distribution, retail sale, or transportation of cannabis-infused
beverages unless the person holds or is an independent contractor, agent, servant, or
employee of a person who holds the kind of license that authorizes the act, or is a
third party utilized by a direct shipper licensee as set forth in KRS 243.027.
(2) The holding of any permit from the United States government to traffic in alcoholic
beverages without the corresponding requisite state and local licenses shall in all
cases raise a rebuttable presumption that the holder of the United States permit is
unlawfully trafficking in alcoholic beverages.
(3) Except as permitted by KRS 243.033, 243.036, 243.155, 243.157, and 243.260, a
person, conducting a place of business patronized by the public, who is not a
licensee authorized to sell alcoholic beverages, shall not permit any person to sell,
barter, loan, give away, or drink alcoholic beverages on the premises of the place of
business.
(4) A licensee shall not permit any consumer to possess, give away, or drink alcoholic
beverages or cannabis-infused beverages on the licensed premises that are not
purchased from the licensee.
(5) In a moist territory, the only types of licenses that may be issued are those that
directly correspond with the types of sales approved by the voters through moist
elections within the territory, unless otherwise specifically authorized by statute.
(6) If a licensee holds two (2) or more licenses, only the specific license for which the
licensee has violated the terms shall be subject to suspension or revocation.
(7) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (4) of this section, with the written permission
of a licensed entertainment destination center:
(a) A retail drink licensee located wholly within a licensed entertainment
destination center or that has a storefront sharing a physical boundary with
Page 33 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
that licensed entertainment destination center may allow persons on the
licensee's premises to possess and drink alcoholic beverages that were
purchased from another retail drink licensee located wholly within, or that has
a storefront sharing a physical boundary with, the licensed entertainment
destination center; and
(b) A nonlicensed place of business that is located wholly within a licensed
entertainment destination center or that has a storefront sharing a physical
boundary with that licensed entertainment destination center may allow
persons on its property to possess and drink alcoholic beverages that were
purchased from a retail drink licensee located wholly within, or that has a
storefront sharing a physical boundary with, the licensed entertainment
destination center.
Section 9. KRS 243.030 is amended to read as follows:
The following licenses that authorize traffic in distilled spirits and wine and in cannabis-
infused beverages may be issued by the distilled spirits administrator. Licenses that
authorize traffic in all alcoholic beverages may be issued by both the distilled spirits
administrator and malt beverages administrator. The licenses and their accompanying
fees are as follows:
(1) Distiller's license:
(a) Class A, per annum .......................................................... $2,980.00[$3,090.00]
(b) Class B (craft distillery), per annum .................................... $890.00[$1,000.00]
(c) Off-premises retail sales outlet, per annum ............................................$300.00
(2) Rectifier's license:
(a) Class A, per annum .............................................................................$2,580.00
(b) Class B (craft rectifier), per annum ........................................................$825.00
(3) Winery license, per annum ..........................................................................$1,030.00
(4) Small farm winery license, per annum ...........................................................$110.00
Page 34 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) Small farm winery off-premises retail license, per annum ......................$30.00
(5) Wholesaler's license, per annum ..................................................................$2,060.00
(6) Quota retail package license, per annum .........................................................$570.00
(7) Quota retail drink license, per annum ..............................................................$620.00
(8) Transporter's license, per annum ....................................................................$210.00
(9) Special nonbeverage alcohol license, per annum .............................................$60.00
(10) Special agent's or solicitor's license, per annum ...............................................$30.00
(11) Bottling house or bottling house storage license, per annum ......... .............$1,030.00
(12) Special temporary license, per event ..............................................................$100.00
(13) Special Sunday retail drink license, per annum ...............................................$520.00
(14) Caterer's license, per annum ...........................................................................$830.00
(15) Special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license, per event ...................$100.00
(16) Extended hours supplemental license, per annum .......................................$2,060.00
(17) Hotel in-room license, per annum ...................................................................$210.00
(18) Air transporter license, per annum ..................................................................$520.00
(19) Sampling license, per annum ...........................................................................$110.00
(20) Replacement or duplicate license ......................................................................$25.00
(21) Entertainment destination center license:
(a) When the licensee is a city, county, urban-county government,
consolidated local government, charter county government, or
unified local government, per annum .................................................$2,577.00
(b) All other licensees, per annum ............................................................$7,730.00
(22) Limited restaurant license, per annum .............................................................$780.00
(23) Limited golf course license, per annum ...........................................................$720.00
(24) Small farm winery wholesaler's license, per annum .......................................$110.00
(25) Qualified historic site license, per annum ....................................................$1,030.00
(26) Nonquota type 1 license, per annum ........................ ...................................$4,120.00
Page 35 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(27) Nonquota type 2 license, per annum ................................................................$830.00
(28) Nonquota type 3 license, per annum ................................................................$310.00
(29) Distilled spirits and wine storage license, per annum ..................................$620.00
(30) Out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's license, per annum ...........$1,550.00
(31) Limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's
license, per annum ..........................................................................................$260.00
(32) Authorized public consumption license, per annum ........................................$250.00
(33) Direct shipper Type A license, per annum.......................................................$100.00
(34) Limited nonquota package license, per annum ................................................$300.00
(35) Vintage distilled spirits license, per annum .....................................................$300.00
(36) Cannabis-infused beverage retail package license, per annum .....................$2,000.00
(37) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license, per annum ........................$1,000.00
(38) Cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license,
supplemental, per annum ..............................................................................$1,000.00
(39) Direct shipper Type B license, per annum ....................................................$1,000.00
(40) Souvenir package sales license, per annum ...................................................$110.00
(41) A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new
transitional license pursuant to KRS 243.045.
(42)[(41)] Other special licenses the board finds necessary for the proper regulation and
control of the traffic in distilled spirits and wine and provides for by administrative
regulation. In establishing the amount of license taxes that are required to be fixed
by the board, it shall have regard for the value of the privilege granted.
(43)[(42)] The fee for each of the first five (5) supplemental bar licenses shall be the
same as the fee for the primary retail drink license. There shall be no charge for
each supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the
same premises.
A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each
Page 36 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
new application under this section, except for subsections (4), (8), (9), (10), (12), (15),
(19), and (20) of this section. The application fee shall be applied to the licensing fee if
the license is issued; otherwise it shall be retained by the department.
Section 10. KRS 243.0305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any licensed Kentucky distiller that is located in wet territory or in any precinct
that has authorized the limited sale of alcoholic beverages at distilleries under KRS
242.1243 and that has a gift shop or other retail outlet on its premises may conduct
the activities permitted under this section as a part of its distiller's license.
(2) (a) For purposes of all retail drink and package sales that occur pursuant to
subsection (3), (4), (7), (9), (10), (12), or (13) of this section, the distillery
shall:
1. Be permitted to transfer its products from the distillery proper to the
location where those retail sales occur without having to transfer
physical possession of those distilled spirits to a licensed wholesaler;
and
2. Without otherwise reporting those distilled spirits to a licensed
wholesaler, report those retail sales and pay all taxes required to the
Department of Revenue at the time and in the manner required by the
Department of Revenue in accordance with its powers under KRS
131.130(3).
(b)[ 1.] A distiller selling distilled spirits in accordance with this
subsection shall pay all state regulatory license fees[wholesale sales
taxes] due under Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[KRS 243.884]. For the
purposes of this subsection, "selling"["wholesale sales"] means a sale
of distilled spirits made by a distiller under subsection (3)(b), (4), (7),
(9), (10), (12), and (13) of this section, if required by Section 1 or
Section 2 of this Act[KRS 243.884], excluding sales made by a distiller
Page 37 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
under subsection (4)(a)3. and (b) of this section that utilize a licensed
wholesaler.[
2. A distiller shall pay the excise tax on distilled spirits in accordance with
KRS 243.720 and 243.730.]
(c) All other distilled spirits that are produced by the distillery shall be sold and
physically transferred in compliance with all other relevant provisions of KRS
Chapters 241 to 244.
(3) If a distiller holds a souvenir package sales license, it may sell its own private
selection packages and souvenir packages at retail:
(a) To consumers in accordance with KRS 243.027 to 243.029 if it holds a direct
shipper license; and
(b) To distillery visitors of legal drinking age, in quantities not to exceed an
aggregate of nine (9) liters per purchaser per day.
(4) If a distiller holds a souvenir package sales license, it may conduct private
selection events and sell private selection packages at retail, as follows:
(a) Distillers may sell private selection packages to consumers who participated
in a private selection event only by:
1. Shipping the private selection packages in accordance with KRS
243.027 to 243.029 if the distiller holds a direct shipper license, but
these sales and shipments shall be exempt from the quantity limitations
established in KRS 243.028(1);
2. Selling the private selection packages to the participating consumers
directly from the distillery premises, but these sales shall be exempt
from the quantity limitations established in subsection (3)(b) of this
section; or
3. Selling the private selection packages through a wholesaler and to a
licensed retailer of the consumer's choice. The distillery and
Page 38 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
wholesaler's cooperation in facilitating the sale of the private selection
packages to the retailer of the consumer's choice shall not be deemed a
violation of KRS 244.240.
(b) Except as provided in KRS 243.036, distillers may sell private selection
packages to retail licensees that participated in a private selection event only
through a licensed wholesaler.
(c) A distillery shall make available for purchase not less than seventy percent
(70%) of its annual private selection packages to licensed wholesalers and
shall maintain records of such transactions in accordance with KRS 244.150.
(d) Distillers may sell private selection packages to wine and distilled spirits
wholesalers, malt beverage distributors, and microbreweries that hold a quota
retail drink or quota retail package license that participated in a private
selection event if the private selection packages resulting from the event are
sold only through a licensed retailer.
(5) Hours of sale for souvenir packages sold at retail and private selection packages
sold at retail shall be in conformity with KRS 244.290(3).
(6) Except as provided in this section, souvenir package and private selection package
sales to distillery visitors shall be governed by all the statutes and administrative
regulations governing the retail sale of distilled spirits by the package.
(7) Souvenir packages sold to distillery visitors under subsection (3)(b) of this section,
which are not made available to wholesalers licensed in Kentucky or elsewhere,
shall be registered by the licensed distiller with the department and shall be sold
exclusively to in-person distillery visitors in quantities not to exceed three (3) liters
per person per day.
(8) Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 244.050 to the contrary, a distillery holding
a sampling license may allow visitors to sample distilled spirits under the following
conditions:
Page 39 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) Sampling shall be permitted only on the licensed premises during regular
business hours;
(b) A distillery shall not charge for the samples; and
(c) A distillery shall not provide more than one and three-fourths (1-3/4) ounces
of samples per visitor per day, except in connection with a private selection
event.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 243.110, in accordance with this section, a
distillery located in wet territory or in any territory that has authorized the limited
sale of alcoholic beverages under an election held pursuant to KRS 242.1243 may:
(a) Hold an NQ2 retail drink license for the sale of alcoholic beverages on the
distillery premises; and
(b) Employ persons to engage in the sale or service of alcohol under an NQ2
license, if each employee completes the department's Server Training in
Alcohol Regulations program within thirty (30) days of beginning
employment.
(10) A distiller may sell to consumers at fairs, festivals, and other similar types of events
located in wet territory. A distiller may:
(a) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink, containing spirits distilled or bottled on
the premises of the distillery;
(b) Sell by the package in quantities not to exceed nine (9) liters per person, per
day; and
(c) Serve complimentary samples not to exceed one and three-fourths (1-3/4)
ounces per person, per day.
(11) A distiller may offer for sale in its gift shop products that were produced in
collaboration with a brewer or microbrewer, except that:
(a) These packages shall not be exclusive to the distiller's gift shop; and
(b) The distiller shall purchase the jointly branded souvenir package only from a
Page 40 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
licensed malt beverage distributor or a microbrewery pursuant to KRS
243.157(1)(f). A microbrewery selling and delivering the jointly branded
souvenir package directly to a distiller under this subsection shall provide
notice to the distributor of any self-distribution delivery by electronic or other
means.
(12) (a) A distiller that holds a Class B distiller's license but does not hold a Class A
distiller's license under KRS 243.030 may sell and deliver to any licensed
retailer up to five thousand (5,000) gallons of distilled spirits annually, sold
under a brand name owned or exclusively licensed to the distillery, provided
the distilled spirits were:
1. Produced by the distillery;
2. Produced for the distillery under a written contract with another licensed
manufacturer; or
3. Bottled for or by the distillery.
(b) Any products sold and delivered under this subsection that are not otherwise
registered by a licensed wholesaler shall be registered by the distillery with
the department.
(c) Any products sold and delivered under this subsection shall be delivered by
the distillery in vehicles owned and operated by the distillery, displaying the
distillery's name and license number.
(d) The distillery is responsible for payment of all applicable taxes and reporting
of self-distributed distilled spirits.
(e) The distillery may extend credit on distilled spirits sold to retail licensees for a
period not to exceed thirty (30) days from the date of invoice, with the date of
invoice included in the total number of days.
(f) A distillery shall report self-distribution sales under this subsection as follows:
1. For a sale of in excess of nine (9) liters to any given retailer on any
Page 41 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
given day, the distillery shall provide at least twenty-four (24) hours
advance written or electronic notice to wholesalers that have an existing
business relationship with the distillery and that distribute the products
the distillery is self-distributing. If advance notice is not practicable, the
distillery shall notify the wholesaler within one (1) business day of
delivery;
2. A distillery shall submit a quarterly report of its self-distribution sales
under this subsection to wholesalers that have an existing business
relationship with the distillery and that distribute the products the
distillery is self-distributing. The quarterly report shall describe the type,
quantity, and price of the product that was self-distributed, the retail
delivery location, and the date of delivery of the self-distribution sales in
the most recently completed quarter preceding the due date of the report;
and
3. Each distillery engaging in self-distribution sales under this subsection
shall report to the department the total number of gallons self-distributed
annually at the time of the renewal of its Class B distiller's license.
(13) A distiller that sells souvenir packages and serves complimentary samples in
accordance with this section at any of its licensed premises may, for each such
premises, maintain one (1) separately licensed off-premises retail sales outlet and
engage in the activities and hold the licenses authorized in subsections (3), (4), (8),
(9), (11), and (12) of this section if the off-premises retail sales outlet premises are
located in wet territory or in a precinct that has authorized alcoholic beverage sales
by the distillery under KRS 242.1243. The distiller shall pay the fee required under
KRS 243.030 for each off-premises retail sales outlet it maintains.
(14) Except as expressly stated in this section, this section does not exempt the holder of
a distiller's license from:
Page 42 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) The provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244;
(b) The administrative regulations of the board;[ and]
(c) Regulation by the board at all the distiller's licensed premises; and
(d) The state regulatory license fees imposed by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act.
(15) A distiller shall only sell souvenir packages pursuant to this section if it also
holds a souvenir package sales license.
(16) Nothing in this section shall be construed to vitiate the policy of this
Commonwealth supporting an orderly three (3) tier system for the production and
sale of alcoholic beverages.
(17) A distiller may permit leashed dogs on its premises, consistent with any applicable
health or safety codes.
Section 11. KRS 243.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A caterer's license may be issued as a supplementary license to a caterer that holds a
quota retail package license, a quota retail drink license, an NQ1 license, an NQ2
license, or a limited restaurant license.
(2) The caterer's license may be issued as a primary license to a caterer in any wet
territory or in any moist territory under KRS 242.1244 for the premises that serves
as the caterer's commissary and designated banquet hall. A[No] primary caterer's
license shall not authorize alcoholic beverage sales at a premises that operates as a
restaurant. The alcoholic beverage stock of the caterer shall be kept under lock and
key at the licensed premises during the time that the alcoholic beverages are not
being used in conjunction with a catered function.
(3) The caterer's license shall authorize the caterer to:
(a) Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS
243.088, 243.250, and 244.260;
(b) Transport, sell, serve, and deliver alcoholic beverages by the drink at locations
away from the licensed premises or at the caterer's designated banquet hall in
Page 43 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
conjunction with the catering of food and alcoholic beverages for a customer
and the customer's guests, in:
1. Cities and counties established as moist territory under KRS 242.1244 if
the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event are at least
seventy percent (70%) of the gross receipts from the catering of both
food and alcoholic beverages;
2. Precincts established as moist territory if the receipts from the catering
of food at any catered event are at least ten percent (10%) of the gross
receipts from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages. This
subparagraph shall supersede any conflicting provisions of KRS
Chapters 241 to 244;
3. Wet cities and counties in which quota retail drink licenses are not
available if the receipts from the catering of food at any catered event
are at least fifty percent (50%) of the gross receipts from the catering of
both food and alcoholic beverages; or
4. All other wet territory if the receipts from the catering of food at any
catered event are at least thirty-five percent (35%) of the gross receipts
from the catering of both food and alcoholic beverages;
(c) Receive and fill telephone orders for alcoholic beverages in conjunction with
the ordering of food for a catered event; and
(d) Receive payment for alcoholic beverages served at a catered event on a by-
the-drink, cash bar, or by-the-event basis. The caterer may bill the customer
for by-the-function sales of alcoholic beverages in the usual course of the
caterer's business.
(4) A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages at locations for which retail
alcoholic beverage licenses or special temporary licenses have been issued. A
caterer licensee may cater a charitable or nonprofit fundraising event or a state or
Page 44 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
national conference for which a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction
license has been issued under KRS 243.036.
(5) A caterer licensee shall not cater alcoholic beverages on Sunday except in territory
in which the Sunday sale of alcoholic beverages is permitted under the provisions
of KRS 244.290 and 244.480.
(6) The location at which alcoholic beverages are sold, served, and delivered by a
caterer, pursuant to this section, shall not constitute a public place for the purpose of
KRS Chapter 222. If the location is a multi-unit structure, only the unit or units at
which the function being catered is held shall be excluded from the public place
provisions of KRS Chapter 222.
(7) The caterer licensee shall post a copy of the licensee's caterer's license at the
location of the function for which alcoholic beverages are catered.
(8) All restrictions and prohibitions applying to a quota retail drink licensee and an
NQ4 retail malt beverage drink licensee not inconsistent with this section shall
apply to the caterer licensee.
(9) The caterer licensee shall maintain records as set forth in KRS 244.150 and in
administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(b) of this section, a caterer may serve alcoholic
beverages to guests who are twenty-one (21) years of age or older at a private event
in dry territory if:
(a) The alcoholic beverages were lawfully purchased in a wet or moist territory:
1. By an individual; or
2. At the caterer's licensed premises in wet or moist territory; and
(b) The alcoholic beverages are not sold in dry territory to guests at the private
residence or private event regardless of whether the venue is a public place.
Section 12. KRS 243.036 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license may be issued to:
Page 45 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) An auctioneer licensed under KRS Chapter 330;[ or to ]
(b) A charitable organization;[ or ]
(c) A nonprofit organization; or
(d) The organizer or sponsor of a state or national conference.
(2) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license issued to a charitable or
nonprofit organization or to the organizer or sponsor of a state or national
conference shall authorize the holder to:
(a) Purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, and deliver alcoholic
beverages by the package or by the drink to be sold by auction or raffle or
given away or served or consumed at charity or nonprofit events or at state or
national conferences;
(b) Purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, and deliver limited specially
labeled bottles of alcoholic beverages to be sold or given away at charity or
nonprofit events or state or national conferences;
(c) Obtain alcoholic beverages from distillers, rectifiers, wineries, small farm
wineries, brewers, microbreweries, wholesalers, distributors, retailers, or any
other person, by gift or donation, for the purpose of charity or nonprofit
events or state or national conferences; and
(d) Receive payment for alcoholic beverages sold at events.
(3) For a charitable or nonprofit organization or a state or national conference-
sponsored auction:
(a) Each alcoholic beverage auction or raffle[ conducted by a charitable
organization] shall be subject to all restrictions and limitations contained in
KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and the administrative regulations issued under
those chapters and shall be authorized only on the days and only during the
hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized in the
county or municipality; and
Page 46 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(b) The location at which the alcoholic beverages are auctioned, raffled, or
consumed under this section shall not constitute a public place for the purpose
of KRS Chapter 222. Charitable,[ or] nonprofit, or state or national
conference-sponsored events may be conducted on licensed or unlicensed
premises. The[ charitable] organization possessing a special temporary
alcoholic beverage auction license shall post a copy of the license at the
location of the event.
(4) An auctioneer holding a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license may:
(a) Transport, receive, possess, store, advertise, auction, sell, deliver, and ship
alcoholic beverages either sold or intended for sale at auction by the licensee;
(b) Sell only alcoholic beverages at auction that:
1. Were previously lawfully sold at retail; and
2. Are in their original manufacturer's unopened container;
(c) Deliver and ship any alcoholic beverages sold at an auction directly to the
consumer who purchased the alcoholic beverages. Any shipment to a
consumer outside of this state is subject to all applicable laws of the
jurisdiction in which that consumer is located. When shipping alcoholic
beverages directly to a consumer in this state, the auctioneer holder of the
license shall:
1. Ensure that the shipping label on each container containing the alcoholic
beverages conspicuously states the following: "CONTAINS
ALCOHOL: SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER
REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY";
2. Obtain the signature of a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of
age at the delivery address prior to delivery, after requiring that person
to demonstrate that he or she is at least twenty-one (21) years of age by
providing a valid identification document; and
Page 47 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
3. Not ship the alcoholic beverages to any address in this state located in
dry territory; and
(d) Conduct the auction on premises licensed by the department, unlicensed
premises, or online.
(5) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction conducted by an auctioneer shall
be:
(a) Subject to all restrictions and limitations contained in KRS Chapters 241 to
244 and the administrative regulations issued under those chapters;
(b) Separate from any other type of alcoholic beverage auction authorized under
KRS Chapters 241 to 244, but may be combined with other types of auctions
authorized under KRS Chapter 330;
(c) Authorized for in-person live auctions and online auction closings only on the
days and only during the hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is
otherwise authorized in the county or municipality where the live auction is
held or, for an online auction, the physical location of the alcoholic beverages
being sold; and
(d) Subject to the auction and auctioneer requirements of KRS Chapter 330.
(6) An auctioneer conducting a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction shall:
(a) Post a copy of its special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license and
auctioneer license at the location of the event for in-person auctions and on
the auction website for online auctions; and
(b) Not hold any other type of alcoholic beverage license.
(7) Alcoholic beverages shall only be sold by an auctioneer under a special temporary
alcoholic beverage auction license if the alcoholic beverages were not purchased or
attained for the purpose of resale at auction and in the following circumstances:
(a) As an "Estate Auction," or included in such auction where the alcoholic
beverages being offered at auction are the property belonging to the estate of
Page 48 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
one (1) or more deceased persons and are being offered by:
1. The direction and authority of the authorized executor or administrator;
2. Court order; or
3. The direction or on behalf of a surviving spouse or direct heirs;
(b) As a "Living Estate Auction" or "Downsizing Auction" or included in such
auction where the alcoholic beverages being offered at auction are the
property belonging to a person or persons of a household that is in transition
due to one (1) of the following life-changing situations:
1. One (1) or more members of the household moving into a retirement
home, nursing home, assisted living home, or a smaller residence; or
2. Combining one (1) household with another; or
(c) As a partial or complete disbursement of an alcoholic beverage collection
consisting of more than one (1) package that has been collected by the same
individual or household. An individual or household shall not sell collections
at auction more than once every three (3) years.
(8) (a) A person shall not purchase alcoholic beverages from an auctioneer at a
special temporary alcoholic beverage auction unless that person may lawfully
receive or possess the alcoholic beverages.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prevent a vintage distilled spirits licensee from
purchasing alcoholic beverages at auction if the alcoholic beverages qualify as
vintage distilled spirits.
(9) All advertising for an auctioneer special temporary alcoholic beverage auction
shall:
(a) Show the name and license number for the special temporary alcoholic
beverage auction license and the auctioneer license; and
(b) Conform to all advertising requirements and restrictions for auctions
contained in KRS Chapter 330 and any administrative regulations
Page 49 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
promulgated under that chapter.
(10) If a person ceases to be licensed as an auctioneer under KRS Chapter 330, the
person's special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall be automatically
suspended until the person reestablishes licensure as an auctioneer.
(11) An auctioneer holding a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall
file a quarterly report with the department, which shall be established and
maintained by the department, utilizing a form prescribed by the department that
includes the following information:
(a) The number of alcoholic beverage packages auctioned in the preceding three
(3) months in total, with each purchase matched to the individuals who both
sold and purchased the alcoholic beverages;
(b) The date of each purchase;
(c) The name, address, and phone number of each individual who sold and
purchased the alcoholic beverages;
(d) A detailed description of the alcoholic beverages purchased, including the
brand name, number of packages, and the size of the packages; and
(e) Whether each alcoholic beverage package was purchased in-person, delivered
in-person, or shipped.
(12) A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall not be issued for any
period longer than thirty (30) days.
(13) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, a distiller,
rectifier, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery, wholesaler, distributor,
or retailer may donate, give away, or deliver any of its products to a charitable or
nonprofit organization or the organizer or sponsor of a state or national
conference possessing a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license under
this section.
(14) All restrictions and prohibitions applying to an alcoholic beverage retail package
Page 50 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
and alcoholic beverage by the drink license, not inconsistent with this section, shall
apply to a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license.
Section 13. KRS 243.039 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited golf course license may be issued to an establishment that is a nine (9) or
an eighteen (18) hole golf course that meets United States Golf Association criteria
as a regulation golf course as long as the establishment is within:
(a) Any wet territory;[ or]
(b) Any territory where the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful; or
(c) Any moist precinct that has specifically authorized the sale of distilled spirits,
wine, and malt beverages at that establishment under KRS 242.123.
(2) A limited golf course license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive,
possess, and sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at retail by the drink for
consumption on the licensed premises. The licensee shall purchase distilled spirits,
wine, and malt beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. The
license shall not authorize the licensee to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt
beverages by the package.
Section 14. KRS 243.040 is amended to read as follows:
The following kinds of malt beverage licenses may be issued by the malt beverages
administrator, the fees for which shall be:
(1) Brewer's license, per annum ........................................................................$2,580.00
(2) Microbrewery license, per annum ...................................................................$520.00
(3) Distributor's license, per annum ......................................................................$520.00
(4) Nonquota retail malt beverage package license, per annum ............ $570.00[$210.00]
(5) Out-of-state malt beverage supplier's license,
per annum ....................................................................................................$1,550.00
(6) Malt beverage storage license, per annum ......................................................$260.00
(7) Replacement or duplicate license, per annum ...................................................$25.00
Page 51 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(8) Limited out-of-state malt beverage supplier's license,
per annum .......................................................................................................$260.00
(9) Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license,
per annum .......................................................................................................$210.00
(10) Direct shipper Type A license, per annum.......................................................$100.00
(11) The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may obtain a
Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50). The
holder of a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license may obtain a nonquota
retail malt beverage package license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50).
(12) A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new
transitional license pursuant to KRS 243.045.
(13) Other special licenses as the state board finds to be necessary for the administration
of KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and for the proper regulation and control of the
trafficking in malt beverages, as provided for by administrative regulations
promulgated by the state board.
A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each
new application for a license under this section. The application fee shall be applied to
the licensing fee if the license is issued, or otherwise the fee shall be retained by the
department.
Section 15. KRS 243.042 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A qualified historic site license may be issued to any establishment meeting the
criteria established in KRS 241.010 as long as the establishment is within:
(a) Any wet territory; or
(b) Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS
242.1242.
(2) A qualified historic site license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink at one (1) or more permanent or
Page 52 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
nonpermanent locations on the premises over which the licensee, by lease or
ownership, has exclusive control without obtaining additional supplemental
bar licenses prescribed by KRS 243.037;
(b) Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink to patrons at public or private functions
held on the premises;[ and]
(c) Sell alcoholic beverages by the package under a limited nonquota package
license to patrons at public or private functions held on the premises in a
jurisdiction that has authorized the sale of distilled spirits and wine by the
package; and
(d) Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS
243.088, 243.250, and 244.260.
SECTION 16. KRS 243.075 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "City or county" means a city, including a city recognized under KRS
67C.111; county; urban-county government; consolidated local
government; charter county government; or unified local government;
(b) "Gross receipts" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act; and
(c) "Regulatory license fee" means a local fee imposed by a city or county
pursuant to this section.
(2) (a) The legislative body of a city or county may by ordinance impose a
regulatory license fee upon the gross receipts of the sale of alcoholic
beverages and cannabis-infused beverages of each establishment where
alcoholic beverage sales or cannabis-infused beverage sales are lawful.
(b) The regulatory license fee may be levied at the beginning of each budget
period to support local emergency services within the city's or county's
jurisdiction or to reimburse the local government for the estimated costs of
Page 53 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
any additional policing, regulatory, or administrative expenses related to the
sale of alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages in the city or
county.
(c) The regulatory license fee shall be in addition to any other taxes, fees, or
licenses permitted by law, except:
1. A credit against a regulatory license fee shall be allowed in an amount
equal to any licenses or fees imposed by the city or county pursuant to
KRS 243.060 or 243.070;
2. In a county in which the city and county both levy a regulatory license
fee, the county license fee shall only be applicable outside the
jurisdictional boundaries of those cities which levy a license fee; and
3. In any consolidated local government in which the local regulatory
license fee is levied on or after July 1, 2026, and in which there are
cities recognized under KRS 67C.111 within the jurisdictional
boundaries of the consolidated local government which assess a local
regulatory license fee as of January 1, 2026, the consolidated local
government fee shall only be applicable outside the boundaries of
those cities recognized under KRS 67C.111 that levy a fee.
(3) (a) For any election held after one (1) year prior to the effective date of this Act,
any new fee authorized by subsection (2) of this section shall be enacted by
the city or county no later than one (1) year from the date of the local option
election held pursuant to KRS Chapter 242.
(b) For any election held one (1) year or more prior to the effective date of this
Act, the city or county may enact a regulatory license fee based on that
election no later than one (1) year after the effective date of this Act.
(4) Subject to the restrictions in subsection (7) of this section, the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
Page 54 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
KRS Chapter 13A that set forth the process by which a city or county, in the first
year following the discontinuance of prohibition, may estimate any additional
emergency services funding within its jurisdiction and policing, regulation, and
administrative expenses by a city or county directly and solely related to the
discontinuance of prohibition. This subsection shall apply to any discontinuance
of prohibition occurring after the promulgation of administrative regulations
required by this subsection.
(5) (a) The revenue received from the imposition of the regulatory license fee
authorized by subsection (2) of this section shall be:
1. Deposited into a segregated fund of the city or county;
2. Spent only in accordance with the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section; and
3. Audited in accordance with subsection (6) of this section.
(6) (a) By January 1, 2028, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall conduct audits of
each local government imposing the regulatory license fee authorized by
subsection (2) of this section for a full audit of the segregated fund
established in subsection (5) of this section for the most recently completed
ten (10) fiscal years. The local government shall retain all documentation
relating to the segregated fund for the audited years.
(b) If the local government fails to substantially comply with the requirements
of this section, the local government shall:
1. Forfeit all revenue it collected through the regulatory license fee
during the audited years;
2. Reimburse the regulatory license fee audit fund established in
subsection (10) of this section for the cost of the audit with funds from
an account other than the segregated regulatory license fee fund; and
3. Be prohibited from imposing the regulatory license fee for ten (10)
Page 55 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
years.
(c) Any protest or appeal by a local government related to the findings of an
audit completed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be
conducted within the administrative procedures of the Auditor of Public
Accounts.
(d) The cost of all audits conducted pursuant to this subsection shall be paid
from the regulatory license fee audit fund established in subsection (10) of
this section.
(e) The Auditor of Public Accounts may contract with other auditing entities to
assist in the completion of audits required by this subsection.
(7) (a) Any city or county that was authorized to impose the regulatory license fee
by this section prior to the effective date of this Act shall:
1. Not impose the regulatory license fee at a rate greater than the rate it
imposed on January 1, 2026, at any time during the four (4) years
after the effective date of this Act; and
2. Impose the fee at a rate of no more than three percent (3%) within
four (4) years after the effective date of this Act.
(b) Any city or county that initially begins to impose the regulatory license fee
on or after the effective date of this Act shall impose the fee at a rate of no
more than one percent (1%).
(8) A direct shipper licensee shall be subject to and remit the regulatory license fee
imposed by this section as though it were an establishment located in a city or
county licensed to sell alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages. Any
regulatory license fee imposed pursuant to this section shall be considered a tax
as defined in KRS 243.029.
(9) Any city or county imposing a regulatory license fee pursuant to this section shall
file with the:
Page 56 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) Department a report showing the applicable fee amount and remittance
address for each affected license type in its jurisdiction. Any adoption of this
fee or modification of the applicable fee amount or remittance address for
each affected licensee shall be reported to the department within thirty (30)
days of adoption by the city or county imposing the fee. Within twenty (20)
days after receipt of the information, the department shall compile and
publish the information so that it is readily available to the public; and
(b) Department for Local Government an annual report on or before
September 30 of each year that shows the actual expenses incurred and paid
and the receipts taken in relating to the regulatory license fee. If the city or
county fails to file this report within fifteen (15) days after its due date, the
city's or county's funds for the previous year taken in through the
regulatory license fee shall be forfeited to the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(10) (a) There is hereby established in the State Treasury a trust and agency
account to be known as the regulatory license fee audit fund. The fund shall
consist of moneys received pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, state
appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds.
(b) The fund shall be administered by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(c) Amounts deposited in the fund shall be used to pay all expenses accruing
from audits conducted pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and for no
other purpose.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
year.
Section 17. KRS 243.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each kind of license listed in
KRS 243.030 shall be incompatible with every other kind listed in that section and
Page 57 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
no person or entity holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a
license of another kind listed in KRS 243.030.
(2) (a) Each kind of license listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4) shall be
incompatible with every other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4), and
no person holding a license of any of those kinds shall apply for or hold a
license of any other kind listed in KRS 243.040(1), (3), or (4).
(b) A brewery holding a license listed in KRS 243.040(5) or (8) shall not apply
for or hold a license listed in KRS 243.040(3) or (4).
(3) (a) The holder of a quota retail package license may also hold a quota retail drink
license, an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3 retail
drink license, a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license, or a special
nonbeverage alcohol license.
(b) The holder of a transporter's license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine
storage license.
(c) The holder of a distiller's license may also hold a rectifier's license, a special
nonbeverage alcohol license, a winery license, or a small farm winery license.
(d) A commercial airline system or charter flight system retail license, a
commercial airline system or charter flight system transporter's license, and a
retail drink license if held by a commercial airline or charter flight system
may be held by the same licensee.
(e) A Sunday retail drink license, vintage distilled spirits license, and
supplemental license may be held by the holder of a primary license.
(f) The holder of a distiller's, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery,
distilled spirits and wine supplier's, or malt beverage supplier's license may
also hold a direct shipper license.
(g) The holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an
NQ3 retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, a qualified historic site
Page 58 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
license, or a limited restaurant license may also hold a limited nonquota
package license.
(4) (a) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall not
apply for or hold the license listed in KRS 243.030(5) or 243.040(3).
(b) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage retail package license shall also
hold a quota retail package license.
(c) The holder of a cannabis-infused beverage distributor's license may hold it as
a primary license or as a supplemental license to a distributor's license or a
wholesaler's license.
(5) Any person may hold two (2) or more licenses of the same kind.
(6) A person or entity shall not evade the prohibition against applying for or holding
licenses of two (2) kinds by applying for a second license through or under the
name of a different person or entity. The state administrator shall examine the
ownership, membership, and management of applicants, and shall deny the
application for a license if the applicant is substantially interested in a person or
entity that holds an incompatible license.
Section 18. KRS 243.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A distiller's, rectifier's, or winery license shall authorize the licensee to engage in
the business of distiller, rectifier, or winery at the premises specifically designated
in the license, to maintain aging warehouses, to bottle products manufactured for
itself, and to transport for itself[himself or herself] only any alcoholic beverage
which the licensee[he or she] is authorized under the license to manufacture or sell.
The licensee shall transport alcoholic beverages only by a vehicle operated by
itself[himself or herself], which has affixed to its sides at all times a sign of form
and size prescribed by the state board, containing among other things the name and
license number of the licensee.
(2) (a) 1. A licensee holding a distiller's license, Class A license, or Class B
Page 59 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
license shall distill no less than six hundred (600) gallons in one (1) year
at the distillery's licensed premises. Documentation of production shall
be:
a. Provided by each licensee to the department upon the renewal of
its distiller's license; and
b. Considered confidential tax information pursuant to KRS
131.190 and excepted from public inspection pursuant to KRS
61.878(1)(l), except as authorized by court order.
2. A licensee that engages in the distilling process for the exclusive
purpose of providing training and education, conducting research, or
teaching about the distilling process, aging, or bottling of distilled spirits
shall be exempt from subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, so long as the
licensee does not produce spirits for sale to the general public.
(b) Distillers that produce more than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of distilled
spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a distiller's license, Class
A.
(c) Distillers that produce fifty thousand (50,000) gallons or less of distilled
spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a distiller's license, Class
B (craft distillery).
(3) (a) Rectifiers that rectify more than fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of distilled
spirits per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a rectifier's license, Class
A.
(b) Rectifiers that rectify fifty thousand (50,000) gallons or less of distilled spirits
per calendar year at the premises shall obtain a rectifier's license, Class B
(craft rectifier).
(4) (a) A distiller that is located in wet territory, or in any precinct that has authorized
the limited sale of alcoholic beverages at distilleries under KRS 242.1243,
Page 60 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
may sell distilled spirits by the drink or by the package at retail to consumers
in accordance with KRS 243.0305.
(b) Any distilled spirits sold under this subsection shall be taxed and distributed
in the same manner as sales under KRS 243.0305(2).
(c) Except as provided in this subsection, sales under this subsection shall be
governed by all of the statutes and administrative regulations governing the
retail sale of distilled spirits by the drink.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Vitiate the policy of this Commonwealth supporting an orderly three (3) tier
system for the production and sale of alcoholic beverages; or
(b) Allow delivery or shipment of alcohol into dry or moist territory.
Section 19. KRS 243.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A small farm winery may apply for a small farm winery license. In addition to all
other licensing requirements, an applicant for a small farm winery license shall
submit with its application a copy of the small farm winery's federal basic permit
and proof documenting its annual wine production. The board shall promulgate
administrative regulations establishing the form the documentation of proof of
production shall take.
(2) A small farm winery license shall authorize the licensee to perform the following
functions without having to obtain separate licenses, except that each small farm
winery off-premises retail site shall be separately licensed and the state regulatory
license fees imposed by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall be paid by the licensee:
(a) Engage in the business of a winery under the terms and conditions of KRS
243.120 and 243.130, except that a small farm winery may sell and deliver
wine produced by it to a retailer as authorized by this section. The
manufacture of wine at the small farm winery shall not be less than two
hundred fifty (250) gallons, and shall not exceed five hundred thousand
Page 61 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(500,000) gallons, in one (1) year;
(b) Bottle wines produced by that small farm winery and other licensed small
farm wineries;
(c) Enter into an agreement with another licensed small farm winery under which
it crushes, processes, ferments, bottles, or any combination of these services,
the grapes, fruits, or other agricultural products of the other small farm winery
for a production year. The resulting wine shall be considered the product of
the small farm winery that provides the fruit. The small farm winery
providing the custom crushing services may exclude the wine produced under
this paragraph from its annual production gallonage;
(d) If the licensed small farm winery or off-premises retail site premises is located
in wet territory or in a precinct that has authorized alcoholic beverage sales by
the small farm winery under KRS 242.124:
1. Serve complimentary samples of wine produced by it in amounts not to
exceed six (6) ounces per patron per day; and
2. Sell by the drink for on-premises consumption or off-premises
consumption pursuant to KRS 243.081, or by the package wine
produced by it or by another licensed small farm winery, at retail to
consumers;
(e) Sell by the drink or by the package, at fairs, festivals, and other similar types
of events, wine produced by it or by another licensed small farm winery, at
retail to consumers if all sales occur in a wet territory;
(f) Sell and transport wine produced by it to consumers, licensed small farm
winery off-premises retail sites, wholesale license holders, and small farm
winery license holders, except that wine purchased between small farm
wineries shall not exceed five hundred (500) gallons per year per small farm
winery;
Page 62 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(g) Consume on the premises wine produced by the small farm winery or a
licensed small farm winery and purchased by the drink or by the package at
the licensed premises, if the small farm winery is located in wet territory;
(h) Sell wine at retail to consumers in accordance with KRS 243.027 to 243.029
if it holds a direct shipper license; and
(i) Sell and deliver, in accordance with KRS 243.120(1), up to twelve thousand
(12,000) gallons of wine produced by it annually to any retail license holder
as long as:
1. Any products sold and delivered under this paragraph that are not
otherwise registered by a licensed wholesaler shall be registered with the
department by the small farm winery;
2. The small farm winery is responsible for payment of wine state
wholesale regulatory license fees[wholesale sales taxes] and reporting
of self-distributed wines in accordance with Section 2 of this Act[KRS
243.884]; and
3. The small farm winery may extend credit on wine sold to retail licensees
for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days from the date of invoice, with
the date of invoice included in the total number of days.
This paragraph shall not apply to small farm winery wholesalers licensed
under KRS 243.154.
(3) If the requirements of KRS 242.1241 or 244.290(5) relating to Sunday sales on the
licensed premises of a small farm winery are met, a small farm winery within that
territory may sell alcoholic beverages on Sunday only in accordance with this
section during the hours and times as permitted in the local ordinance for that
locality.
(4) A small farm winery license holder may also hold an NQ2 retail drink license or an
NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license if:
Page 63 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) The small farm winery is located in wet territory or in a precinct that has
authorized alcoholic beverage sales by the small farm winery under KRS
242.124; and
(b) The issuance of these licenses is in connection with the establishment and
operation of a restaurant, hotel, inn, bed and breakfast, conference center, or
any similar business enterprise designed to promote viticulture, enology, and
tourism.
(5) This section shall not exempt the holder of a small farm winery license from the
provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, nor from the administrative regulations of
the board, nor from regulation by the board at all premises licensed by the small
farm winery, except as expressly stated in this section.
(6) Nothing contained in this section shall exempt a licensed out-of-state winery from
obeying the laws of its resident state.
(7) Upon the approval of the department, a small farm winery license may be renewed
after the licensee submits to the department the winery's federal basic permit and
proof of its annual wine production. Documentation of production shall be:
(a) Provided by each licensee to the department upon the renewal of its small
farm winery license; and
(b) Considered confidential tax information pursuant to KRS 131.190 and
excepted from public inspection pursuant to KRS 61.878(1)(l), except as
authorized by court order.
(8) An employee of a small farm winery may sample the products produced by that
small farm winery for purposes of education, quality control, and product
development.
(9) A small farm winery may permit leashed dogs on its premises, consistent with any
applicable health or safety codes.
Section 20. KRS 243.157 is amended to read as follows:
Page 64 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(1) A microbrewery license shall authorize the licensee to perform the following
functions:
(a) Engage in the business of a brewer under the terms and conditions of KRS
243.150, provided that production of malt beverages at the microbrewery shall
not exceed fifty thousand (50,000) barrels in one (1) year;
(b) Serve[ on the premises] complimentary samples of malt beverages produced
by the microbrewery in amounts not to exceed sixteen (16) ounces per patron,
provided the microbrewery is located in wet territory or a precinct that has
authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages at microbreweries under KRS
242.1239;
(c) Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery to licensed
distributors;
(d) Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery for on- and
off-premises purposes in accordance with subsection (3)(b) and (c) of this
section, pursuant to the following:
1. Without restriction on the amount of malt beverages sold by the drink
for on-premises consumption provided the microbrewery is located in
wet territory or a precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic
beverages at microbreweries under KRS 242.1239; and
2. With a restriction on the amount of malt beverages sold for off-premises
consumption, in an aggregate amount not to exceed thirty-one (31)
gallons per person per day that shall not include more than three (3)
cases in case format;
(e) Sell:
1. Unlimited amounts of malt beverages by the drink; and
2. Not more than one (1) case of packaged malt beverages;
produced on the premises of the microbrewery to consumers at fairs, festivals,
Page 65 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
and other similar types of events located in wet territory, in accordance with
subsection (3)(b)2. and (c)2. of this section; and
(f) Sell and deliver up to two thousand five hundred (2,500) barrels of malt
beverages annually to any retail license holder, provided that [:
1. ]any products sold and delivered under this paragraph that are not
otherwise registered by a licensed distributor shall be registered with the
department by the microbrewery[; and
2. The microbrewer notifies the distributor of any self-distribution delivery
by electronic or other means].
(2) A microbrewery license shall not be deemed to be incompatible with any other
license except for a distributor's license under the provisions of KRS 243.180.
(3) In accordance with the provisions of this section, a microbrewery license holder
may:
(a) Hold retail drink and package licenses both on and off the premises of the
microbrewery. The holder of a microbrewery license is exempt from the
provisions of KRS 244.570 and 244.590 as applied to any retail licenses held
by the microbrewery license holder, and from any other sections which would
restrict the co-ownership of the microbrewery license and any retail licenses
described in this section;
(b) Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery for on-
premises purposes without having to transfer physical possession of those
malt beverages to a licensed distributor provided:
1. The microbrewery possesses a retail drink license for those premises;
and
2. The microbrewery reports and pays all taxes and state regulatory
license fees required by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[subsection (5)(a)
and (b) of this section] to the Department of Revenue at the time and in
Page 66 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
the manner required by the Department of Revenue in accordance with
its powers under KRS 131.130(3); and
(c) Sell malt beverages produced on the premises of the microbrewery for off-
premises purposes without having to transfer physical possession of those
malt beverages to a licensed distributor provided that:
1. The microbrewery possesses a retail package license for those premises;
and
2. The microbrewery reports and pays all taxes and state regulatory
license fees required by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[subsection (5)(a)
and (b) of this section] to the Department of Revenue at the time and in
the manner required by the Department of Revenue in accordance with
its powers under KRS 131.130(3).
(4) The provisions of subsection (3)(b) and (c) of this section shall apply only to malt
beverages that are produced by the microbrewery at its licensed premises and:
(a) Offered for sale by the microbrewery at that same premises under the
microbrewery's retail drink or package license; or
(b) Offered for sale by the microbrewery at a fair, festival, or other similar type of
event as authorized under subsection (1)(e) of this section.
All other malt beverages produced by the microbrewery which are offered for retail
sale shall be sold and physically transferred to a licensed distributor in compliance
with all other relevant provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, and a licensed
microbrewery shall not otherwise affect sales of malt beverages directly to retail
customers except as provided in subsection (3)(b) and (c) of this section under KRS
243.027 to 243.029 if the microbrewery holds a direct shipper license.
(5) (a) A microbrewery selling malt beverages in accordance with subsection (1)(d),
(e), or (f)[ or (3)(b) and (c)] of this section shall pay all[ wholesale sales]
taxes and state regulatory license fees due under Sections 1 and 2 of this
Page 67 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
Act[KRS 243.884]. For the purposes of this subsection, "selling"["wholesale
sales"] means a sale of malt beverages made by a microbrewery under
subsection (1)(d), (e), or (f)[ or (3)(b) and (c)] of this section, as applicable.
(b) A microbrewery[ shall pay the excise tax on malt beverages in accordance
with KRS 243.720(3) and 243.730 and] shall be entitled to the credit set forth
in Section 2 of this Act[KRS 243.720(3)(b)].
(6) A microbrewery shall not be located in dry territory.
(7) An employee of a microbrewery may sample the products produced by that
microbrewery for purposes of education, quality control, and product development.
(8) This section does not exempt the holder of a microbrewery license from the
provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, nor from any rules of the board as
established by administrative regulations, nor from regulation by the board, except
as expressly stated in this section. The provisions of this section shall not be
deemed inconsistent with the provisions of KRS 244.602.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to vitiate the policy of this
Commonwealth, as set forth in KRS 244.167 and 244.602, supporting an orderly
three (3) tier system for the production and sale of malt beverages.
(10) Documentation of production shall be:
(a) Provided by each licensee to the department upon the renewal of its
microbrewery license; and
(b) Considered confidential tax information pursuant to KRS 131.190 and
excepted from public inspection pursuant to KRS 61.878(1)(l), except as
authorized by court order.
(11) A microbrewery may permit leashed dogs on its premises, consistent with any
applicable health or safety codes.
Section 21. KRS 243.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A licensed wholesaler may purchase, receive, store, or possess distilled spirits and
Page 68 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
wine to sell at wholesale, from the licensed premises only, and to transport to and
from the licensed premises only alcoholic beverages that the wholesaler's license
authorizes the licensee to sell. The wholesaler may transport:
(a) Beverages in the manner provided for manufacturers in KRS 243.120; and
(b) Distilled spirits and wine from a manufacturer's warehouse or from another
licensed wholesaler's premises to the licensed wholesaler premises.
(2) The holder of a wholesaler's license may sell and transport its products to the holder
of a special nonbeverage alcohol license.
(3) The holder of a wholesaler's license shall:
(a) Have exclusive control over the licensed premises and its contents; and
(b) Ensure distilled spirits, wine, and business records stored on the premises
are adequately secured.
Section 22. KRS 243.238 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A limited nonquota package license may be issued as a supplementary license to a
licensee that holds an NQ1 retail drink license, an NQ2 retail drink license, an NQ3
retail drink license, a quota retail drink license, a qualified historic site license, or a
limited restaurant license in a jurisdiction that has authorized the sale of distilled
spirits and wine by the package.
(2) The limited nonquota package license shall authorize the licensee to:
(a) Purchase private selection packages in the original manufacturer's unopened
containers; and
(b) Sell private selection packages at retail in the original manufacturer's
unopened containers, and only for consumption off the licensed premises.
(3) The licensee shall purchase private selection packages in accordance with KRS
243.0305(4).
Section 23. KRS 243.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A nonquota retail malt beverage package license shall authorize the licensee to:
Page 69 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) Sell malt beverages at retail by the package from the licensed premises only
for consumption off the licensed premises only; and
(b) Purchase malt beverages only from a distributor.
(2) The holder of a quota retail package license under KRS 243.240 may also obtain a
license under this section.
(3) The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may also hold a NQ4
retail malt beverage drink license.
(4) A nonquota retail malt beverage package license shall not be issued to sell malt
beverages at retail for any premises from which gasoline and lubricating oil are sold
or from which the servicing and repair of motor vehicles is conducted, unless there
is maintained in inventory on the premises for sale at retail not less than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) of food, groceries, and related products valued at cost.
(5) The term "food and groceries" means:
(a) Any food or food product intended for human consumption except alcoholic
beverages, tobacco, hot foods, and hot food products prepared for immediate
consumption; and
(b) Seeds and plants to grow food for personal consumption.
(6) The provisions of this section shall not apply to any licensed premises which sells
no fuel other than marine fuel.
Section 24. KRS 243.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A special agent's or solicitor's license may be issued to a duly authorized
representative, employee, or agent of, or solicitor for a distiller, rectifier, winery, or
wholesaler licensed in Kentucky or by the state of his or her residence and by the
United States if a resident therein. The license shall authorize the licensee to offer
for sale and to solicit orders for the sale of any alcoholic beverage sold by a
distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler who is licensed in Kentucky or who is a
nonresident. The licensee shall only offer for sale or solicit orders from those
Page 70 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
wholesale or retail licensees legally authorized to buy and receive the alcoholic
beverages of the distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler licensed in Kentucky.
The license shall set forth the name, address, and, unless the vendor is a
nonresident, the license numbers of the vendors the agent or solicitor represents, as
well as the name, address, and license number of the agent or solicitor. An agent or
solicitor shall not represent any vendor or licensee whose name does not appear
upon the license or the application for the license.
(2) A special agent's or solicitor's license may be issued to a nonresident of this state.
The license shall authorize the nonresident to represent a manufacturer, winery, or
wholesaler who is licensed by another state and by the federal government, if the
nonresident has been issued a license by another state conferring privileges similar
to a special agent's or solicitor's license authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
If the state of residence of the applicant does not issue a similar license, the
application filed with the department shall not be accepted without the approval of
the alcoholic beverage control agency of the state of the applicant's residence.
Section 25. KRS 243.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For each application for any new or transitional license issued by the
department, the department shall provide public notice by listing the
application on a dedicated public website space controlled by the department
for fourteen (14) days, beginning on the day the application is submitted[All
persons shall, before applying for a license, advertise by publication their
intention to apply for a license in the newspaper for legal notices for the
county or city whose local administrator has jurisdiction over the proposed
premises].
(b) For each application for any new or transitional license that also requires a
license issued by a local administrator, the local administrator may publish
a public notice by listing the application in the same manner that public
Page 71 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
meeting notices are published on a dedicated public website space
controlled by the local administrator or the legislative body of the affiliated
city or county for fourteen (14) days, beginning on the day the application is
submitted to the department[An advertisement under this subsection may be
made online or in print].
(c) The department shall[may] prescribe the form and content of the public
website space described in paragraph (a) of this subsection[advertisement]
by an administrative regulation[ that is] promulgated in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A.
(2) The public notice and website requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall
not apply to an applicant for the same license for the same premises, or an applicant
for any of the following licenses:
(a) Out-of-state malt beverage supplier's license;
(b) Limited out-of-state malt beverage supplier's license;
(c) Out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's license;
(d) Limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier's license;
(e) Supplemental bar license;
(f) Extended hours supplemental license;
(g) Special agent or solicitor's license;
(h) Special nonbeverage alcohol license;
(i) Transporter's license;
(j) Special Sunday drink license;
(k) Hotel in-room license;
(l) Sampling license;
(m) Direct shipper license;
(n) Special temporary drink license; or
(o) Vintage distilled spirits license.
Page 72 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(3) The department's or local administrator's application listing under subsection (1)
of this section[notice] shall state[contain] the following[ information]:
(a) The[ notice shall state: the] name and address of the applicant and the name[
and address] of each principal owner, partner, member, officer, and director if
the applicant is a partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, governmental agency, or other business entity recognized by law;
(b) The[ notice shall specifically state the] location of the premises for which the
license is sought, the type of business, and the type of license being requested;
and
(c) The[ notice shall state the] date the application was[will be] filed and shall
contain the following statement:
1. For a listing published by the department: "Any person may protest the
approval of the license by writing the Department of Alcoholic
Beverage Control within fourteen (14)[thirty (30)] days of the date the
application was submitted to the department[of legal publication]."; or
2. For a listing published by a local administrator: "Any person may
protest the approval of the license by writing to the local administrator
within fourteen (14) days of the date the application was submitted to
the department."
(4) Any protest received after the fourteen (14)[thirty (30)] day period has expired
shall not be considered a valid legal protest by the local administrator or the board.
(5) Substantial compliance with the information listed in subsection (3) of this section
shall be sufficient to comply with this section.
Section 26. KRS 243.630 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purpose of this section, "transfer" means:
(a) The transfer to a new person or entity of ten percent (10%) or more ownership
interest in any licensed business or license;
Page 73 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(b) The transfer in bulk, and not in the ordinary course of business, of a major
part of the fixtures, materials, supplies, merchandise, or other inventory of a
licensee's business; or
(c) The transfer of a business or license to a different premises.
(2) Any license issued to any person for any licensed premises shall not be transferable
or assignable to any other person or to any other premises or to any other part of the
building containing the licensed premises, unless a transfer or assignment is
authorized by the state administrator in the exercise of sound discretion.
(3) A licensee shall not acquire or otherwise dispose of any interest in a licensed
premises or any license issued by the department, by sale of assets, stock,
inventory, control or right of control, or activities on the licensed premises without
prior approval of the state administrator. The state administrator shall treat a
transfer applicant as a new applicant for qualification and discretion purposes.
(4) Any acquisition of interest in a license without prior authorization shall be void.
(5) All applications for approval of a transfer shall be made in writing to the state
administrator having jurisdiction over the license.
(6) Applications for approval of a transfer shall be made under oath or affirmation,
shall be signed by both the transferor and the transferee, and shall contain any other
information prescribed by the department.
(7) The appropriate state administrator shall deny or approve the application when, in
the sound discretion of the administrator, all of the necessary information has been
obtained or the applicant has refused to provide requested information, but it shall
not be acted upon before the end of the public protest period outlined in KRS
243.360.
(8) A[No] licensee or other person seeking to acquire an interest in an existing license
shall not transfer control or assume control of any licensed premises by agreement
or otherwise without the written consent of the state administrator of malt beverages
Page 74 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
or the state administrator of distilled spirits or both.
(9) A licensee shall not transfer its license or any interest in the license while any
proceedings against the license or the licensee for a violation of any statute or
administrative regulation which may result in the suspension or revocation of the
license are pending.
(10) (a) A licensee shall not transfer its license or any interest it has in the license if
the licensee owes a debt on the inventory to a wholesaler responsible for the
collection and payment of the state wholesale regulatory license fee[tax]
imposed under Section 2 of this Act.
(b) A transfer shall not take place until the department is notified that the
licensee's indebtedness has been paid or resolved to all wholesalers.
(c) If a licensee owes debt on the inventory to a wholesaler and the licensee
surrenders its license, or its license otherwise becomes inactive, a new
license shall not be issued on the same premises unless the new license
applicant signs an affidavit swearing that a transfer is not taking place[KRS
243.884].
(11) A licensee shall not transfer its license or any interest in the license if the licensee
owes the Commonwealth of Kentucky for taxes as defined in KRS 243.500(4). A
transfer shall not take place until the department is notified by the Kentucky
Department of Revenue that the licensee's indebtedness has been paid or resolved to
the satisfaction of the Department of Revenue. This section shall not prohibit a
transfer of a license or an interest in a license by a trustee in bankruptcy if all other
requirements of this section are met.
Section 27. KRS 243.710 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each wholesaler or self-distributing distiller shall pay to the Department of
Revenue five cents ($0.05) per case on each case of distilled spirits sold by the
wholesaler or self-distributing distiller in the state. This tax shall be computed each
Page 75 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
month according to the report required to be filed by KRS 243.850 and shall be paid
on or before the date in each succeeding month when reports are required to be
filed.
(2) This section shall expire on July 1, 2027.
Section 28. KRS 243.720 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of distilled
spirits a tax of one dollar and ninety-two cents ($1.92) on each wine gallon of
distilled spirits, and a proportional rate per gallon on all distilled spirits used,
sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than one (1) gallon, but
the rate of the excise tax on spirits in retail containers of one-half (1/2) pint
shall be twelve cents ($0.12); and
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, distilled
spirits placed in containers for sale at retail, where the distilled spirits
represent six percent (6%) or less of the total volume of the contents of the
containers, shall be taxed at the rate of twenty-five cents ($0.25) per gallon.
(2) There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of wine, a tax of
fifty cents ($0.50) on each gallon of wine, and a proportional rate per gallon on the
wine used, sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than one (1) gallon,
but the tax shall not be less than four cents ($0.04) on the sale or distribution of any
retail container of wine.
(3) (a) There is levied upon the sale or distribution by sale or gift of malt beverages
an excise tax of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) on each barrel of thirty-one
(31) gallons and a proportional rate per gallon on malt beverages sold or
distributed in any container of more or less than thirty-one (31) gallons;
(b) Each brewer producing malt beverages in this state shall be entitled to a credit
of fifty percent (50%) of the tax levied on each barrel of malt beverages sold
in this state, up to three hundred thousand (300,000) barrels per annum.
Page 76 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(4) There is levied upon the use, sale, or distribution by sale or gift of cannabis-infused
beverages a tax of one dollar and ninety-two cents ($1.92) on each gallon of a
cannabis-infused beverage, and a proportional rate per gallon on all cannabis-
infused beverages used, sold, or distributed in any container of more or less than
one (1) gallon.
(5) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Wine manufactured, sold, given away, or distributed and used solely for
sacramental purposes; or
(b) Distilled spirits and wine purchased by holders of special licenses provided
for in KRS 243.320 and purchased and used in the manner authorized by
those licenses.
(6) Subsections (1), (2), (3), and (5) of this section shall expire on July 1, 2027.
Section 29. KRS 243.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Wholesalers of distilled spirits and wine shall pay and report the tax and fees
levied by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[KRS 243.720(1) and (2)] on or before
the twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which
possession or title of the distilled spirits and wine is transferred from the
wholesaler to retailers or consumers in this state, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed
reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(b) 1. Distributors or retailers of malt beverages, who purchase malt beverages
directly from a brewer, shall pay and report the tax and fees levied by
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[KRS 243.720(3)] on or before the twentieth
day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which the
brewer sells, transfers, or passes title of the malt beverage to the
distributor or retailer, in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed reasonably to protect the
Page 77 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
revenues of the Commonwealth.
2.[ The credit allowed brewers in this state, under the provisions of KRS
243.720(3)(b), shall flow through to the distributor or retailer who
purchases malt beverages directly from the brewer.
3.] If a brewer sells, transfers, or passes title to malt beverages to any of its
employees for home consumption or to any charitable or fraternal
organization pursuant to the provisions of KRS 243.150, the brewer
shall be responsible for paying and reporting the tax and fees levied by
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[KRS 243.720(3)] in accordance with the
provisions of paragraph (d) of this subsection.
(c) Cannabis-infused beverage distributors shall pay and report the tax levied by
KRS 243.720(4) on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next
succeeding the month in which possession or title of the cannabis-infused
beverages are transferred from the cannabis-infused beverage distributor to
retailers or consumers in this state, in accordance with administrative
regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed reasonably to
protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(d) 1. Every brewer selling, transferring, or passing title to malt beverages to
any person in this state other than a distributor or retailer;
2. Every manufacturer of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the
Department for Public Health selling, transferring, or passing title to
cannabis-infused beverages to any person in this state other than a
distributor or retailer; and
3. Every other person selling, transferring, or passing title of distilled
spirits, wine, malt beverages, or cannabis-infused beverages to
distributors, retailers, cannabis-infused beverage licensees, or
consumers;
Page 78 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
shall report and pay the tax and fees levied by Sections 1 and 2 of this Act
and KRS 243.720 on or before the twentieth day of the calendar month next
succeeding the month in which possession or title of distilled spirits, wine,
malt beverages, or cannabis-infused beverages is transferred to a distributor,
retailer, cannabis-infused beverage licensee, or consumer in this state, in
accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter
13A designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(e) Every distributor, retailer, or consumer possessing, using, selling, or
distributing distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or cannabis-infused
beverages in this state upon which the tax and fees levied by Sections 1 and 2
of this Act and KRS 243.720[ and 243.884] has not been paid shall be jointly
and severally liable for reporting and paying the tax due, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A designed
reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth. The liability shall
not be extinguished until the tax has been paid to the Department of Revenue.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, every
owner of a small farm winery shall pay and report the tax and fees levied by
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act[KRS 243.720 (1) and (2)] on a quarterly basis, in
accordance with administrative regulations of the Department of Revenue
designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(2) Every wholesaler of distilled spirits or wine before using, selling, or distributing by
sale or gift distilled spirits and wine shall register with the Department of Revenue.
(3) Every brewer before selling or distributing by sale or gift malt beverages, or before
importing malt beverages into the state, shall register with the Department of
Revenue in a manner as the Department of Revenue may require.
(4) Every manufacturer of cannabis-infused beverages before selling or distributing by
sale or gift cannabis-infused beverages, or before importing cannabis-infused
Page 79 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
beverages into the state, shall:
(a) Obtain a permit as a food manufacturer through the Department for Public
Health; and
(b) Register with the Department of Revenue in a manner as the Department of
Revenue may require.
(5) A cannabis-infused beverage distributor or retailer shall not be subject to
Sections 1 and 2 of this Act.
Section 30. KRS 243.884 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Before July 1, 2027, for the privilege of making "wholesale sales" or "sales at
wholesale" of malt beverages, wine, distilled spirits, or cannabis-infused
beverages, a tax is hereby imposed upon all wholesalers of wine and distilled
spirits, all distributors of malt beverages or cannabis-infused beverages, all
direct shipper licensees shipping alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused
beverages to a consumer at a Kentucky address, all distillers making sales
pursuant to KRS 243.0305(3), (4)(a)1. and 2. and (c), (7), (9), (10), (12), and
(13), all microbreweries selling malt beverages under KRS 243.157, all small
farm wineries selling wine under KRS 243.155, and all manufacturers of
cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for Public Health.
(b) On or after July 1, 2027, for the privilege of making "wholesale sales" or
"sales at wholesale" of cannabis-infused beverages to a consumer at a
Kentucky address, a tax is hereby imposed on all manufacturers of
cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for Public
Health[Prior to July 1, 2015, the tax shall be imposed at the rate of eleven
percent (11%) of the gross receipts of any wholesaler or distributor derived
from "sales at wholesale" or "wholesale sales" made within the
Commonwealth, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. For the
purposes of this section, the gross receipts of a microbrewery making
Page 80 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
"wholesale sales" shall be calculated by determining the dollar value amount
that the microbrewer would have collected had it conveyed to a distributor the
same volume sold to a consumer as allowed under KRS 243.157(3)(b) and
(c)].
(c) The following rates shall apply to wholesale sales or sales at wholesale:
1. For distilled spirits and cannabis-infused beverages, eleven percent
(11%); and
2. For wine and malt beverages, ten percent (10%).
(d) The following rates shall apply for direct shipper sales:
1. For distilled spirits and cannabis-infused beverages shipments, eleven
percent (11%) for wholesale sales or sales at wholesale; and
2. For wine and malt beverage shipments, ten percent (10%) for wholesale
sales or sales at wholesale.
(e) For direct shipper sales or sales made pursuant to KRS 243.0305, if a
wholesale price is not readily available, the direct shipper licensee or distillery
shall calculate the wholesale price to be seventy percent (70%) of the retail
price of the alcoholic beverages.
(2) Wholesalers of distilled spirits and wine, distributors of malt beverages or cannabis-
infused beverages, microbreweries, distillers, manufacturers of cannabis-infused
beverages permitted by the Department for Public Health, and direct shipper
licensees shall pay and report the tax levied by this section on or before the
twentieth day of the calendar month next succeeding the month in which possession
or title of the distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or cannabis-infused beverages
is transferred from the wholesaler or distributor to retailers, or by microbreweries,
distillers, manufacturers of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the
Department for Public Health, or direct shipper licensees to consumers in this state,
in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A
Page 81 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
designed reasonably to protect the revenues of the Commonwealth.
(3) Gross receipts from sales at wholesale or wholesale sales shall not include the
following sales:
(a) Sales made between wholesalers, between distributors, or between
manufacturers of cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for
Public Health;
(b) Sales from the first fifty thousand (50,000) gallons of wine produced by a
small farm winery in a calendar year made by:
1. The small farm winery; or
2. A wholesaler of that wine produced by the small farm winery; and
(c) Sales made between a direct shipper licensee and a consumer located outside
of Kentucky.
(4) Any portion of this section relating to alcoholic beverages shall expire on July 1,
2027.
Section 31. KRS 243.886 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To reimburse himself or herself for the cost of collecting and reporting the tax, each
person required to pay and report the tax levied by KRS 243.884, other than a
microbrewery or a distiller, shall deduct on each report one percent (1%) of the tax
due, provided the amount due is not delinquent at the time of payment. A
microbrewery or distiller that reports and pays the wholesale sales tax levied by
KRS 243.884, in accordance with KRS 243.0305 or 243.157 as applicable, shall not
be entitled to deduct one percent (1%) of the tax due.
(2) This section shall expire on July 1, 2027.
Section 32. KRS 243.890 is amended to read as follows:
Except as provided in KRS 211.285, receipts derived from taxes and fees assessed and
collected under the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 243A shall be
appropriated for general fund purposes.
Page 82 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
Section 33. KRS 244.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A retail licensee, or the licensee's agent, servant, or employee, shall not sell, give
away, or deliver any alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages, or procure
or permit any alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages to be sold, given
away, possessed by, or delivered to:
(a)[(1)] A minor, except that in any prosecution for selling alcoholic beverages
or cannabis-infused beverages to a minor it shall be an affirmative defense
that the sale was induced by the use of false, fraudulent, or altered
identification papers or other documents and that the appearance and character
of the purchaser were such that the purchaser's age could not have been
ascertained by any other means and that the purchaser's appearance and
character indicated strongly that the purchaser was of legal age to purchase
alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages. This evidence may be
introduced either in mitigation of the charge or as a defense to the charge
itself; or
(b)[(2)] A person who appears to a reasonable person to be actually or
apparently under the influence of alcoholic beverages, cannabis-infused
beverages, controlled substances, other intoxicating substances, or any of
these substances in combination, to the degree that the person may endanger
any person or property, or unreasonably annoy persons in the vicinity.
(2) If a retail licensee violates subsection (1)(a) of this section three (3) or more times
at the same licensed premises within a twenty-four (24) month period, that retail
licensee shall be permanently prohibited from holding any kind of alcoholic
beverage license issued by the department at that licensed premises.
Section 34. KRS 244.585 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any distributor to sell any brand or product name of malt
beverage in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, except in the territory described in a
Page 83 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
written agreement between the supplier or brewer and distributor, authorizing sale
by the distributor of that brand and product name within a designated area, and
within that designated area the distributor shall not refuse to sell or offer reasonable
service to licensed retailers during the normal business hours of the distributor.
Where a supplier or brewer sells several brands and named products, the agreement
need not apply to all brands and named products sold by the supplier or brewer and
may apply to only one (1) brand and product name. A[No] supplier or brewer shall
not provide by the written agreement for the distribution of a brand or named
product of malt beverages to more than one (1) distributor for all or any part of the
designated territory. Upon request, all territorial agreements shall be filed with the
department.
(2) Each distributor shall comply with current, written quality control standards as
determined by the owner of the trademark of the brand of malt beverage, provided
those controls are:
(a) Normal industry practice;
(b) Reasonably related to the maintenance of quality control;
(c) Consistent with the provisions of this chapter and all administrative
regulations promulgated under this chapter; and
(d) Communicated to the distributor through written notice of them from the
owner.
(3) A distributor may sell to only those licensed retailers, religious, charitable, or
fraternal organizations located within its designated geographical territory as
provided in this section and to the distributor's employees and to other distributors
of the same brand. A[No] brand or product name of malt beverage may not be sold
in the Commonwealth of Kentucky without prior written approval of the brewer and
supplier filed with the department.
(4) A territorial designation in any agreement between a distributor and brewer or
Page 84 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
supplier pursuant to this section shall be modified only in accordance with all the
rights and duties of the distributor and brewer or supplier contained in any written
agreement between them or by any other action of the brewer, supplier, or
distributor that is consistent with the terms of their agreement, and this modification
shall be filed pursuant to the provisions of this section. The board shall require each
party to verify that the level of service within the designated territory will not be
adversely affected by the modification. When a distributor is prevented from selling
or servicing retailers within its territory due to natural disasters, labor disputes, or
other causes beyond the distributor's control, the distributor may allow another
distributor of the same brand or named product of malt beverages to sell and service
that brand within its territory upon approval of the brewer or supplier.
(5) The[No] provisions of any agreement shall not expressly or impliedly establish or
maintain the resale price of any brand or product name of malt beverage by the
distributor, nor may any brewer or microbrewery:
(a) Adjust the price at which the brewer or microbrewery sells malt beverages to
a distributor based on the price at which a distributor resells malt beverages
to a retailer; or
(b) Seek to recover any percentage of the distributor's increase in price to a
retailer that may exceed the brewer's or microbrewery's recommended price
to that retailer.
(6) It shall be unlawful for any brewer or microbrewery to require any distributor to
accept delivery of any malt beverages or any other item or commodity that was
not ordered by the distributor or included in sales projections to the brewer or
microbrewery that were agreed upon by the distributor.
(7) Each brewer or microbrewery contracting with a distributor shall submit an
affidavit to the distributor verifying that it will not, by any means, induce a
distributor to, or cause a distributor to, waive or forego any rights granted or
Page 85 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
protected by this chapter with respect to the distributor's franchise.
(8) This section shall not be construed as encouraging or authorizing any unlawful
activity, including but not limited to violations of federal antitrust laws.
Section 35. KRS 131.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of facilitating the administration of the taxes it administers, the
department may require any tax return, report, or statement to be electronically
filed.
(2) (a) A person required to electronically file a return, report, or statement may
apply for a waiver from the requirement by submitting the request on a form
prescribed by the department.
(b) The request shall indicate the lack of one (1) or more of the following:
1. Compatible computer hardware;
2. Internet access; or
3. Other technological capabilities determined relevant by the department.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2026, a licensee:
(a) Holding a microbrewery license and authorized to sell malt beverages under
KRS 243.157; and
(b) Required to pay the state regulatory license fees due pursuant to Sections 1
and 2 of this Act[:
1. Wholesale sales tax under KRS 243.884; and
2. Excise tax on malt beverages under KRS 243.720(3)];
shall electronically submit any payment and tax return, report, or statement to the
department.
Section 36. KRS 139.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise provides:
(1) (a) "Admissions" means the fees paid for:
1. The right of entrance to a display, program, sporting event, music
Page 86 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
concert, performance, play, show, movie, exhibit, fair, or other
entertainment or amusement event or venue; and
2. The privilege of using facilities or participating in an event or activity,
including but not limited to:
a. Bowling centers;
b. Skating rinks;
c. Health spas;
d. Swimming pools;
e. Tennis courts;
f. Weight training facilities;
g. Fitness and recreational sports centers; and
h. Golf courses, both public and private;
regardless of whether the fee paid is per use or in any other form,
including but not limited to an initiation fee, monthly fee, membership
fee, or combination thereof.
(b) "Admissions" does not include:
1. Any fee paid to enter or participate in a fishing tournament; or
2. Any fee paid for the use of a boat ramp for the purpose of allowing
boats to be launched into or hauled out from the water;
(2) "Advertising and promotional direct mail" means direct mail the primary purpose of
which is to attract public attention to a product, person, business, or organization, or
to attempt to sell, popularize, or secure financial support for a product, person,
business, or organization. As used in this definition, "product" means tangible
personal property, an item transferred electronically, or a service;
(3) "Business" includes any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged
in by that person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or
indirect;
Page 87 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(4) "Commonwealth" means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(5) (a) "Cosmetic surgery services" means modifications to all areas of the head,
neck, and body to enhance appearance through surgical and medical
techniques.
(b) "Cosmetic surgery services" does not include surgery services that are
medically necessary to reconstruct or correct dysfunctional areas of the face
and body due to birth disorders, trauma, burns, or disease;
(6) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(7) (a) "Digital audio-visual works" means a series of related images which, when
shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, with accompanying
sounds, if any.
(b) "Digital audio-visual works" includes movies, motion pictures, musical
videos, news and entertainment programs, and live events.
(c) "Digital audio-visual works" shall not include video greeting cards, video
games, and electronic games;
(8) (a) "Digital audio works" means works that result from the fixation of a series of
musical, spoken, or other sounds.
(b) "Digital audio works" includes ringtones, recorded or live songs, music,
readings of books or other written materials, speeches, or other sound
recordings.
(c) "Digital audio works" shall not include audio greeting cards sent by electronic
mail;
(9) (a) "Digital books" means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and
usual sense as books, including any literary work expressed in words,
numbers, or other verbal or numerical symbols or indicia if the literary work
is generally recognized in the ordinary or usual sense as a book.
(b) "Digital books" shall not include digital audio-visual works, digital audio
Page 88 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
works, periodicals, magazines, newspapers, or other news or information
products, chat rooms, or weblogs;
(10) (a) "Digital code" means a code which provides a purchaser with a right to obtain
one (1) or more types of digital property. A "digital code" may be obtained by
any means, including electronic mail messaging or by tangible means,
regardless of the code's designation as a song code, video code, or book code.
(b) "Digital code" shall not include a code that represents:
1. A stored monetary value that is deducted from a total as it is used by the
purchaser; or
2. A redeemable card, gift card, or gift certificate that entitles the holder to
select specific types of digital property;
(11) (a) "Digital property" means any of the following which is transferred
electronically:
1. Digital audio works;
2. Digital books;
3. Finished artwork;
4. Digital photographs;
5. Periodicals;
6. Newspapers;
7. Magazines;
8. Video greeting cards;
9. Audio greeting cards;
10. Video games;
11. Electronic games; or
12. Any digital code related to this property.
(b) "Digital property" shall not include digital audio-visual works or satellite
radio programming;
Page 89 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(12) (a) "Direct mail" means printed material delivered or distributed by United States
mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addressees on a mailing
list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the
cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipient.
(b) "Direct mail" includes tangible personal property supplied directly or
indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail retailer for inclusion in the
package containing the printed material.
(c) "Direct mail" does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to
a single address;
(13) "Directly used in the manufacturing or industrial processing process" means the
process that commences with the movement of raw materials from storage into a
continuous, unbroken, integrated process and ends when the finished product is
packaged and ready for sale;
(14) (a) "Executive employee recruitment services" means services provided by a
person to locate potential candidates to fill open senior-level management
positions.
(b) "Executive employee recruitment services" includes but is not limited to
making a detailed list of client requirements, researching and identifying
potential candidates, performing prescreening interviews, and providing
contract and salary negotiations;
(15) (a) "Extended warranty services" means services provided through a service
contract agreement between the contract provider and the purchaser where the
purchaser agrees to pay compensation for the contract and the provider agrees
to repair, replace, support, or maintain tangible personal property, digital
property, real property, or prewritten computer software access services
according to the terms of the contract.
(b) "Extended warranty services" does not include the sale of a service contract
Page 90 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
agreement for tangible personal property to be used by a small telephone
utility as defined in KRS 278.516 or a Tier III CMRS provider as defined in
KRS 65.7621 to deliver communications services as defined in KRS 136.602
or broadband;
(16) (a) "Finished artwork" means final art that is used for actual reproduction by
photomechanical or other processes or for display purposes.
(b) "Finished artwork" includes:
1. Assemblies;
2. Charts;
3. Designs;
4. Drawings;
5. Graphs;
6. Illustrative materials;
7. Lettering;
8. Mechanicals;
9. Paintings; and
10. Paste-ups;
(17) (a) "Gross receipts" and "sales price" mean the total amount or consideration,
including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal
property, digital property, or services are sold, leased, or rented, valued in
money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any deduction for
any of the following:
1. The retailer's cost of the tangible personal property, digital property, or
services sold;
2. The cost of the materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, all
costs of transportation to the retailer, all taxes imposed on the retailer, or
any other expense of the retailer;
Page 91 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
3. Charges by the retailer for any services necessary to complete the sale;
4. Delivery charges, which are defined as charges by the retailer for the
preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser
including transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and
packing;
5. Any amount for which credit is given to the purchaser by the retailer,
other than credit for tangible personal property or digital property traded
when the tangible personal property or digital property traded is of like
kind and character to the property purchased and the property traded is
held by the retailer for resale; and
6. The amount charged for labor or services rendered in installing or
applying the tangible personal property, digital property, or service sold.
(b) "Gross receipts" and "sales price" shall include consideration received by the
retailer from a third party if:
1. The retailer actually receives consideration from a third party and the
consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the
sale to the purchaser;
2. The retailer has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount
through to the purchaser;
3. The amount of consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and
determinable by the retailer at the time of the sale of the item to the
purchaser; and
4. One (1) of the following criteria is met:
a. The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other
documentation to the retailer to claim a price reduction or discount
where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized,
distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that
Page 92 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon,
certificate, or documentation is presented;
b. The price reduction or discount is identified as a third-party price
reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or
on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the
purchaser; or
c. The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the retailer as a
member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or
discount. A "preferred customer" card that is available to any
patron does not constitute membership in such a group.
(c) "Gross receipts" and "sales price" shall not include:
1. Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a
third party and that are allowed by a retailer and taken by a purchaser on
a sale;
2. Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the
sale of tangible personal property, digital property, or services, if the
amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar
document given to the purchaser;
3. Any taxes legally imposed directly on the purchaser that are separately
stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the
purchaser;[ or]
4. Local alcohol regulatory license fees authorized under KRS 243.075 that
are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document
given to the purchaser; or
5. State retail regulatory license fees imposed by Section 1 of this Act
that are stated separately on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar
document given to the purchaser.
Page 93 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(d) As used in this subsection, "third party" means a person other than the
purchaser;
(18) "In this state" or "in the state" means within the exterior limits of the
Commonwealth and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to
the United States of America;
(19) "Industrial processing" includes:
(a) Refining;
(b) Extraction of minerals, ores, coal, clay, stone, petroleum, or natural gas;
(c) Mining, quarrying, fabricating, and industrial assembling;
(d) The processing and packaging of raw materials, in-process materials, and
finished products; and
(e) The processing and packaging of farm and dairy products for sale;
(20) (a) "Lease or rental" means any transfer of possession or control of tangible
personal property for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. A lease
or rental shall include future options to:
1. Purchase the property; or
2. Extend the terms of the agreement and agreements covering trailers
where the amount of consideration may be increased or decreased by
reference to the amount realized upon sale or disposition of the property
as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 7701(h)(1).
(b) "Lease or rental" shall not include:
1. A transfer of possession or control of property under a security
agreement or deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title
upon completion of the required payments;
2. A transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that
requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required payments
and payment of an option price that does not exceed the greater of one
Page 94 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
hundred dollars ($100) or one percent (1%) of the total required
payments; or
3. Providing tangible personal property and an operator for the tangible
personal property for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. To qualify
for this exclusion, the operator must be necessary for the equipment to
perform as designed, and the operator must do more than maintain,
inspect, or setup the tangible personal property.
(c) This definition shall apply regardless of the classification of a transaction
under generally accepted accounting principles, the Internal Revenue Code, or
other provisions of federal, state, or local law;
(21) (a) "Lobbying services" means the act of promoting or securing passage of
legislation or an attempt to influence or sway a public official or other public
servant toward a desired action, including but not limited to the support of or
opposition to a project or the passage, amendment, defeat, approval, or veto of
any legislation, regulation, rule, or ordinance.[;]
(b) "Lobbying services" includes but is not limited to the performance of
activities described as executive agency lobbying activities as defined in KRS
11A.201, activities described under the definition of lobby in KRS 6.611, and
any similar activities performed at the local, state, or federal levels;
(22) (a) "Machinery for new and expanded industry" means machinery:
1. Directly used in the manufacturing or industrial processing process of:
a. Tangible personal property at a plant facility;
b. Distilled spirits or wine at a plant facility or on the premises of a
distiller, rectifier, winery, or small farm winery licensed under
KRS 243.030 that includes a retail establishment on the premises;
or
c. Malt beverages at a plant facility or on the premises of a brewer or
Page 95 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
microbrewery licensed under KRS 243.040 that includes a retail
establishment;
2. Which is incorporated for the first time into:
a. A plant facility established in this state; or
b. Licensed premises located in this state; and
3. Which does not replace machinery in the plant facility or licensed
premises unless that machinery purchased to replace existing machinery:
a. Increases the consumption of recycled materials at the plant
facility by not less than ten percent (10%);
b. Performs different functions;
c. Is used to manufacture a different product; or
d. Has a greater productive capacity, as measured in units of
production, than the machinery being replaced.
(b) "Machinery for new and expanded industry" does not include repair,
replacement, or spare parts of any kind, regardless of whether the purchase of
repair, replacement, or spare parts is required by the manufacturer or seller as
a condition of sale or as a condition of warranty;
(23) "Manufacturing" means any process through which material having little or no
commercial value for its intended use before processing has appreciable
commercial value for its intended use after processing by the machinery;
(24) "Marketplace" means any physical or electronic means through which one (1) or
more retailers may advertise and sell tangible personal property, digital property, or
services, or lease tangible personal property or digital property, such as a catalog,
Internet website, or television or radio broadcast, regardless of whether the tangible
personal property, digital property, or retailer is physically present in this state;
(25) (a) "Marketplace provider" means a person, including any affiliate of the person,
that facilitates a retail sale by satisfying subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
Page 96 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
paragraph as follows:
1. The person directly or indirectly:
a. Lists, makes available, or advertises tangible personal property,
digital property, or services for sale by a marketplace retailer in a
marketplace owned, operated, or controlled by the person;
b. Facilitates the sale of a marketplace retailer's product through a
marketplace by transmitting or otherwise communicating an offer
or acceptance of a retail sale of tangible personal property, digital
property, or services between a marketplace retailer and a
purchaser in a forum including a shop, store, booth, catalog,
Internet site, or similar forum;
c. Owns, rents, licenses, makes available, or operates any electronic
or physical infrastructure or any property, process, method,
copyright, trademark, or patent that connects marketplace retailers
to purchasers for the purpose of making retail sales of tangible
personal property, digital property, or services;
d. Provides a marketplace for making retail sales of tangible personal
property, digital property, or services, or otherwise facilitates retail
sales of tangible personal property, digital property, or services,
regardless of ownership or control of the tangible personal
property, digital property, or services, that are the subject of the
retail sale;
e. Provides software development or research and development
activities related to any activity described in this subparagraph, if
the software development or research and development activities
are directly related to the physical or electronic marketplace
provided by a marketplace provider;
Page 97 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
f. Provides or offers fulfillment or storage services for a marketplace
retailer;
g. Sets prices for a marketplace retailer's sale of tangible personal
property, digital property, or services;
h. Provides or offers customer service to a marketplace retailer or a
marketplace retailer's customers, or accepts or assists with taking
orders, returns, or exchanges of tangible personal property, digital
property, or services sold by a marketplace retailer; or
i. Brands or otherwise identifies sales as those of the marketplace
provider; and
2. The person directly or indirectly:
a. Collects the sales price or purchase price of a retail sale of tangible
personal property, digital property, or services;
b. Provides payment processing services for a retail sale of tangible
personal property, digital property, or services;
c. Through terms and conditions, agreements, or arrangements with a
third party, collects payment in connection with a retail sale of
tangible personal property, digital property, or services from a
purchaser and transmits that payment to the marketplace retailer,
regardless of whether the person collecting and transmitting the
payment receives compensation or other consideration in exchange
for the service; or
d. Provides a virtual currency that purchasers are allowed or required
to use to purchase tangible personal property, digital property, or
services.
(b) "Marketplace provider" includes but is not limited to a person that satisfies the
requirements of this subsection through the ownership, operation, or control
Page 98 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
of a digital distribution service, digital distribution platform, online portal, or
application store;
(26) "Marketplace retailer" means a seller that makes retail sales through any
marketplace owned, operated, or controlled by a marketplace provider;
(27) (a) "Occasional sale" includes:
1. A sale of tangible personal property or digital property not held or used
by a seller in the course of an activity for which he or she is required to
hold a seller's permit, provided such sale is not one (1) of a series of
sales sufficient in number, scope, and character to constitute an activity
requiring the holding of a seller's permit. In the case of the sale of the
entire, or a substantial portion of the nonretail assets of the seller, the
number of previous sales of similar assets shall be disregarded in
determining whether or not the current sale or sales shall qualify as an
occasional sale; or
2. Any transfer of all or substantially all the tangible personal property or
digital property held or used by a person in the course of such an activity
when after such transfer the real or ultimate ownership of such property
is substantially similar to that which existed before such transfer.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, stockholders, bondholders, partners, or
other persons holding an interest in a corporation or other entity are regarded
as having the "real or ultimate ownership" of the tangible personal property or
digital property of such corporation or other entity;
(28) (a) "Other direct mail" means any direct mail that is not advertising and
promotional direct mail, regardless of whether advertising and promotional
direct mail is included in the same mailing.
(b) "Other direct mail" includes but is not limited to:
1. Transactional direct mail that contains personal information specific to
Page 99 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
the addressee, including but not limited to invoices, bills, statements of
account, and payroll advices;
2. Any legally required mailings, including but not limited to privacy
notices, tax reports, and stockholder reports; and
3. Other nonpromotional direct mail delivered to existing or former
shareholders, customers, employees, or agents, including but not limited
to newsletters and informational pieces.
(c) "Other direct mail" does not include the development of billing information or
the provision of any data processing service that is more than incidental to the
production of printed material;
(29) "Person" includes any individual, firm, copartnership, joint venture, association,
social club, fraternal organization, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver,
trustee, syndicate, cooperative, assignee, governmental unit or agency, or any other
group or combination acting as a unit;
(30) "Permanent," as the term applies to digital property, means perpetual or for an
indefinite or unspecified length of time;
(31) (a) "Photography and photofinishing services" means:
1. The taking, developing, or printing of an original photograph; or
2. Image editing, including shadow removal, tone adjustments, vertical and
horizontal alignment and cropping, composite image creation,
formatting, watermarking printing, and delivery of an original
photograph in the form of tangible personal property, digital property, or
other media.
(b) "Photography and photofinishing services" does not include photography
services necessary for medical or dental health;
(32) "Plant facility" means a single location that is exclusively dedicated to
manufacturing or industrial processing activities. A location shall be deemed to be
Page 100 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
exclusively dedicated to manufacturing or industrial processing activities even if
retail sales are made there, provided that the retail sales are incidental to the
manufacturing or industrial processing activities occurring at the location. The term
"plant facility" shall not include any restaurant, grocery store, shopping center, or
other retail establishment;
(33) (a) "Prewritten computer software" means:
1. Computer software, including prewritten upgrades, that are not designed
and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a
specific purchaser;
2. Software designed and developed by the author or other creator to the
specifications of a specific purchaser when it is sold to a person other
than the original purchaser; or
3. Any portion of prewritten computer software that is modified or
enhanced in any manner, where the modification or enhancement is
designed and developed to the specifications of a specific purchaser,
unless there is a reasonable, separately stated charge on an invoice or
other statement of the price to the purchaser for the modification or
enhancement.
(b) When a person modifies or enhances computer software of which the person
is not the author or creator, the person shall be deemed to be the author or
creator only of the modifications or enhancements the person actually made.
(c) The combining of two (2) or more prewritten computer software programs or
portions thereof does not cause the combination to be other than prewritten
computer software;
(34) "Prewritten computer software access services" means the right of access to
prewritten computer software where the object of the transaction is to use the
prewritten computer software while possession of the prewritten computer software
Page 101 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
is maintained by the seller or a third party, wherever located, regardless of whether
the charge for the access or use is on a per use, per user, per license, subscription, or
some other basis;
(35) (a) "Purchase" means any transfer of title or possession, exchange, barter, lease,
or rental, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means
whatsoever, of:
1. Tangible personal property;
2. An extended warranty service;
3. Digital property transferred electronically; or
4. Services included in KRS 139.200;
for a consideration.
(b) "Purchase" includes:
1. When performed outside this state or when the customer gives a resale
certificate, the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting
of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who
furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the producing,
fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting;
2. A transaction whereby the possession of tangible personal property or
digital property is transferred but the seller retains the title as security
for the payment of the price; and
3. A transfer for a consideration of the title or possession of tangible
personal property or digital property which has been produced,
fabricated, or printed to the special order of the customer, or of any
publication;
(36) "Recycled materials" means materials which have been recovered or diverted from
the solid waste stream and reused or returned to use in the form of raw materials or
products;
Page 102 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(37) "Recycling purposes" means those activities undertaken in which materials that
would otherwise become solid waste are collected, separated, or processed in order
to be reused or returned to use in the form of raw materials or products;
(38) "Remote retailer" means a retailer with no physical presence in this state;
(39) (a) "Repair, replacement, or spare parts" means any tangible personal property
used to maintain, restore, mend, or repair machinery or equipment.
(b) "Repair, replacement, or spare parts" does not include machine oils, grease, or
industrial tools;
(40) (a) "Retailer" means:
1. Every person engaged in the business of making retail sales of tangible
personal property, digital property, or furnishing any services in a retail
sale included in KRS 139.200;
2. Every person engaged in the business of making sales at auction of
tangible personal property or digital property owned by the person or
others for storage, use or other consumption, except as provided in
paragraph (c) of this subsection;
3. Every person making more than two (2) retail sales of tangible personal
property, digital property, or services included in KRS 139.200 during
any twelve (12) month period, including sales made in the capacity of
assignee for the benefit of creditors, or receiver or trustee in bankruptcy;
4. Any person conducting a race meeting under the provision of KRS
Chapter 230, with respect to horses which are claimed during the
meeting.
(b) When the department determines that it is necessary for the efficient
administration of this chapter to regard any salesmen, representatives,
peddlers, or canvassers as the agents of the dealers, distributors, supervisors or
employers under whom they operate or from whom they obtain the tangible
Page 103 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
personal property, digital property, or services sold by them, irrespective of
whether they are making sales on their own behalf or on behalf of the dealers,
distributors, supervisors or employers, the department may so regard them and
may regard the dealers, distributors, supervisors or employers as retailers for
purposes of this chapter.
(c) 1. Any person making sales at a charitable auction for a qualifying entity
shall not be a retailer for purposes of the sales made at the charitable
auction if:
a. The qualifying entity, not the person making sales at the auction, is
sponsoring the auction;
b. The purchaser of tangible personal property at the auction directly
pays the qualifying entity sponsoring the auction for the property
and not the person making the sales at the auction; and
c. The qualifying entity, not the person making sales at the auction, is
responsible for the collection, control, and disbursement of the
auction proceeds.
2. If the conditions set forth in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph are met,
the qualifying entity sponsoring the auction shall be the retailer for
purposes of the sales made at the charitable auction.
3. For purposes of this paragraph, "qualifying entity" means a resident:
a. Church;
b. School;
c. Civic club; or
d. Any other nonprofit charitable, religious, or educational
organization;
(41) "Retail sale" means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than resale,
sublease, or subrent;
Page 104 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(42) (a) "Ringtones" means digitized sound files that are downloaded onto a device
and that may be used to alert the customer with respect to a communication.
(b) "Ringtones" shall not include ringback tones or other digital files that are not
stored on the purchaser's communications device;
(43) (a) "Sale" means:
1. The furnishing of any services included in KRS 139.200; or
2. Any transfer of title or possession, exchange, barter, lease, or rental,
conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever,
of:
a. Tangible personal property; or
b. Digital property transferred electronically;
for a consideration.
(b) "Sale" includes but is not limited to:
1. The producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of
tangible personal property or digital property for a consideration for
purchasers who furnish, either directly or indirectly, the materials used
in the producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting;
2. A transaction whereby the possession of tangible personal property or
digital property is transferred, but the seller retains the title as security
for the payment of the price; and
3. A transfer for a consideration of the title or possession of tangible
personal property or digital property which has been produced,
fabricated, or printed to the special order of the purchaser.
(c) This definition shall apply regardless of the classification of a transaction
under generally accepted accounting principles, the Internal Revenue Code, or
other provisions of federal, state, or local law;
(44) "Seller" includes every person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal
Page 105 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
property, digital property, or services of a kind, the gross receipts from the retail
sale of which are required to be included in the measure of the sales tax, and every
person engaged in making sales for resale;
(45) (a) "Storage" includes any keeping or retention in this state for any purpose
except sale in the regular course of business or subsequent use solely outside
this state of tangible personal property, digital property, or prewritten
computer software access services purchased from a retailer.
(b) "Storage" does not include the keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or
power over tangible personal property for the purpose of subsequently
transporting it outside the state for use thereafter solely outside the state, or
for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured into, attached
to, or incorporated into, other tangible personal property to be transported
outside the state and thereafter used solely outside the state;
(46) "Tangible personal property" means personal property which may be seen,
weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or which is in any other manner perceptible to
the senses and includes natural, artificial, and mixed gas, electricity, water, steam,
and prewritten computer software;
(47) "Taxpayer" means any person liable for tax under this chapter;
(48) "Telemarketing services" means services provided via telephone, facsimile,
electronic mail, text messages, or other modes of communications to another
person, which are unsolicited by that person, for the purposes of:
(a) 1. Promoting products or services;
2. Taking orders; or
3. Providing information or assistance regarding the products or services;
or
(b) Soliciting contributions;
(49) "Transferred electronically" means accessed or obtained by the purchaser by means
Page 106 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
other than tangible storage media; and
(50) (a) "Use" includes the exercise of:
1. Any right or power over tangible personal property or digital property
incident to the ownership of that property, or by any transaction in
which possession is given, or by any transaction involving digital
property or tangible personal property where the right of access is
granted; or
2. Any right or power to benefit from any services subject to tax under
KRS 139.200(2)(p) to (ax).
(b) "Use" does not include the keeping, retaining, or exercising any right or
power over:
1. Tangible personal property or digital property for the purpose of:
a. Selling tangible personal property or digital property in the regular
course of business; or
b. Subsequently transporting tangible personal property outside the
state for use thereafter solely outside the state, or for the purpose
of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured into, attached to,
or incorporated into, other tangible personal property to be
transported outside the state and thereafter used solely outside the
state; or
2. Prewritten computer software access services purchased for use outside
the state and transferred electronically outside the state for use thereafter
solely outside the state.
Section 37. KRS 243.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A transitional license may be issued by the state administrator or administrators
during the time a transfer of an ongoing business is being processed under the
following conditions:
Page 107 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(a) The purchaser shall file an application for a permanent license with the
appropriate local alcoholic beverage authority and with the department;
(b) The purchaser shall submit its license application to the department for
placement on the department's online listing[advertise its intention to apply
for a license] pursuant to KRS 243.360; and
(c) The purchaser shall pay all application fees for the permanent license.
(2) If the above requirements are met, the state administrator or administrators, as
appropriate, may issue a transitional license with a term of up to sixty (60) days,
plus one (1) thirty (30) day renewal license, to the purchaser for a processing fee set
forth in KRS 243.030 to 243.040. All transitional licenses immediately expire upon
the issuance to the purchaser of one (1) or more permanent licenses.
(3) Upon completion of the sale of the business, the purchaser shall not operate the
business on the seller's license.
(4) The transitional license shall not be transferable or used for an application to move
a business from one (1) location to another location.
(5) The transitional license shall entitle the holder to the same privileges and
restrictions of the permanent license or licenses for which the holder applied under
subsection (1)(a) of this section.
Section 38. KRS 243.430 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The state administrator may deny any application for a license if the application is
incomplete or the correct fee has not been remitted with the application.
(2) A license shall not be approved or issued until the fourteen (14)[thirty (30)] day
period in which a protest is permissible has expired. Any license for which
department listing[public notice] under KRS 243.360 is required may conditionally
be issued in less than fourteen (14)[thirty (30)] days from the date the application is
received if the premises has previously operated under the same type of license
within the last twelve (12) months.
Page 108 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
(3) The state administrator shall deny, approve, or issue licenses when, in the sound
discretion of the administrator, all of the information necessary has been obtained
or the applicant has refused to provide requested information.
Section 39. KRS 243.790 is amended to read as follows:
The sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages
manufactured in or imported into this state for shipment permanently out of the state to
be sold without the state and consumed without the state shall not be subject to the state
regulatory license fees imposed by Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act or the tax imposed by
KRS 243.720. Provided, however, the Department of Revenue may, when necessary for
the purpose of control enforcement or protection of revenue, prescribe the conditions
under which containers of the alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages for
shipment permanently out of the state to be sold without the state and consumed without
the state may be kept and trafficked in without payment of the tax.
Section 40. KRS 243.850 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purpose of assisting in the enforcement of Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act
and KRS 243.720, 243.730, 243.790, and 243.884, every licensee[, except
retailers], whether subject to the payment of state regulatory license fees imposed
by Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this Act or the taxes imposed by KRS 243.720, 243.730,
243.790, and 243.884, shall, on or before the twentieth day of each month, render to
the Department of Revenue a statement, in writing, of all trafficking in alcoholic
beverages or cannabis-infused beverages during the preceding month.
(2) The statement shall:
(a) Be taken directly from the records of the reporting licensee or manufacturer of
cannabis-infused beverages permitted by the Department for Public Health,
and shall set forth on forms furnished by the Department of Revenue the
required information; and
(b) Include alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages destined for sale
Page 109 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
outside the state, as well as alcoholic beverages or cannabis-infused beverages
subject to the state regulatory license fees imposed by Sections 1, 2, and 3 of
this Act or the tax imposed by KRS 243.720, 243.730, 243.790, and 243.884.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall have authority to require from retail licensees,
other licensees, and manufacturers of cannabis-infused beverages other reports and
statements at the necessary times for the enforcement of Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this
Act and KRS 243.720, 243.730, 243.790, and 243.884.
Section 41. KRS 243.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who, by himself or herself or acting through another, directly or
indirectly, violates any of the provisions of KRS 243.020 to 243.670, for which no
other penalty is provided, shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor; and for the second and each subsequent violation, he or she shall be
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties provided for in this subsection shall
be in addition to the revocation of the offender's license.
(2) Any person who, by himself or herself or through another, directly or indirectly,
violates subsection (1) of KRS 243.020 shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a
Class B misdemeanor; for the second offense, he or she shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor; and for the third and each subsequent offense, he or she shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(3) Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS 243.020 shall be guilty of a
violation.
(4) Any person who violates KRS 243.620 with respect to a license issued under KRS
243.050 or 243.082 shall be guilty of a violation.
(5) Any person who violates any of the provisions of Section 2 of this Act[KRS
243.720 or 243.730] or any administrative regulation issued thereunder shall be
guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(6) Any person who violates any provision of Section 2 of this Act[KRS 243.710 to
Page 110 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 44
243.850] shall be subject to the uniform civil penalties imposed pursuant to KRS
131.180.
(7) In every case, any state wholesale regulatory license fee[tax] imposed by Section 2
of this Act[KRS 243.710 to 243.720] which is not paid on or before the due date
shall bear interest at the tax interest rate as defined in KRS 131.010(6) from the due
date until the date of payment.
(8) Any person who, by himself or herself or acting through another, directly or
indirectly, violates KRS 243.502(1) shall, for the first offense, be guilty of a Class
B misdemeanor, and for the second and each subsequent violation, he or she shall
be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. The penalties provided for in this subsection
shall be in addition to the suspension or revocation of the offender's license.
(9) Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 243.897 shall be subject to a fine
not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(10) Any vintage distilled spirits seller who, by himself or herself or acting through
another, directly or indirectly, violates any of the provisions of KRS 243.232(6)
shall:
(a) For the first offense, pay a five hundred dollar ($500) fine;
(b) For the second offense, pay a two thousand five hundred dollar ($2,500) fine;
and
(c) For the third and each subsequent offense, pay a five thousand dollar ($5,000)
fine.
Section 42. Sections 1 to 5, 10, 16, 19, 20, 26 to 32, 35, 36, and 39 to 41 of this
Act take effect July 1, 2027.
Section 43. Whereas alcoholic beverages require prompt regulation and
enforcement, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 6, 11, 12, 13, 25, 37, and 38
of this Act take effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 111 of 111
XXXX 2/9/2026 2:54 PM Jacketed